## The First Part: Guatemala

During the night of August 19, 1914, I woke up and saw that my mother was very frightened. She had just lit a candle to give us light. I was barely four-and-half years old, still sleeping in my mother’s bed, yet I remember perfectly what happened. I asked her what had happened and she said, “I felt someone hug me very strongly and, being surprised, I pushed away the heavy object that was pressing on me”. After a while, she extinguished the candle and we continued sleeping. This happened in the village of San Juan Gascón in the town of Antigua Guatemala. The following day a telegraph arrived from the Capital (Guatemala City), sent by my mother’s brother Fernando, with the news that my grandmother Guadalupe Mollinedo de Morales had died the night before. Was this a “Good By” or a coincidence?

Twelve years later, in 1926, my twenty-year-old sister Amalia became gravely ill with typhoid fever. At about seven o’clock at night, our neighbor and close friend of the family, Mrs. María Ortíz Bethancourt, came to visit us. As she was leaving, she asked that, if the disease took a fatal turn, my would mother knock on the wall so she could come over and sit with her. Now the walls of houses in Antigua are masonry and something like three-feet thick. At about eleven o’clock that night, the unfortunate Amalia died. My mother, my sister Marta and I were the only persons present when she died. The first thing my mother told us was that we were not to make any outcry. Thus, crying silently, we started to put the room in order and arrange the body. She told us not to notify the neighbor. However, less than an hour later, we heard someone knocking on the door to the street. We went out and opened the door and were surprised to see that it was our friend Doña María. She said she hurried over to our house because she heard three loud knocks on the wall and she immediately thought that this heralded the death of Amalia. Who called her by hitting the wall three times? Again I ask, was this a “Good By” or a coincidence?

##### Maternal grandparents

I never knew my maternal grandmother Guadalupe Mollinedo de Morales. My sisters Marta, Amalia and I called her Mama Lupe. They say she had a forceful personality who made the lives of her husband and children difficult. She was of the Mollinedo family, one of the principal families of Antigua society. I have no information about the names of her parents. I only know the names of her cousins General Francisco, Tomas and Angela Mollinedo. Other close relatives were Soledad Mollinedo (the wife of the German citizen Mauricio Rosbach), Gloria Mollinedo (wife of the newspaper man Federico Hernández de León) and Gertrudis Matute Mollinedo, nicknamed Mama Tula (the wife of the Honduran writer Ramón Rosa). This last couple, Ramón Rosa and Gertrudis Mollinedo de Rosa, were the parents of my mother’s second cousins Francisca de Boppel, Adriana del Valenzuela, Isidora de Soto and Blanca de Estrada. The majority of the descendents of these families live the Capital of Guatemala (Guatemala City) but I have not seen or heard of them for many, many years. Only a few descendants of the families of Pérez Mollinedo, Flores Mollinedo and Herrera Mollinedo remain in Antigua.

##### Paternal grandparents

Of the family of my paternal grandfather, Juan Clímaco Morales (known to many people as Mr. Juan Quilimáco), I know nothing. The only thing I know is that his nephew, Father Bembenuto Trujillo, was a Priest at the La Merced Church in Antigua Guatemala. 

My grandfather Juan Morales was a military man, a Second Lieutenant in the Army. He told us that he took part in some battles. In one of them, he was almost executed. This happened on the 30th of March, Holy Friday, and his birthday. They were camped in an unpopulated area and the Army troops were short of food. A Captain ordered him to take a platoon of soldiers and look for some cattle they could kill for meat. But what happened is that, as they were passing through a mountainous area, they got lost. They were completely disoriented and could not find their way out. After walking a long way, they finally managed to leave the mountains. In the meantime, because they were gone so long, the Captain sent out other soldiers to look for them and bring them back as fast as possible. When they returned to the camp, the Captain was very angry, and, thinking that they had tried to desert, he gave the order to execute my grandfather for the crime of disobeying orders and for trying to desert. But miraculously, at this very instant, they heard the sound of shots from enemy troops nearby and everyone prepared to repeal the attack. The order to execute my grandfather became of secondary importance and the order was never carried out.

##### The Night Watch and a specter

My grandfather was also the head of the “Night Watchmen” or “Serenos”, a type of police that patrolled the streets of the City of Antigua at night to protect the peace and security of the residents. Every hour they announced the current weather, for example “It is nine o’clock and clear”, “It is eleven o’clock and cloudy”, “It is one o’clock and raining”, etc. Regarding my grandfather, he told us that one night he was stationed in the neighborhood of La Union water tank on one side of the ruins of the Santa Clara Church when he saw a girl pass by. She had her face covered with a veil. He was quick to make some flattering remarks and he began to follow her. Without turning to look, she increased her pace. When he was at the point of catching up with her, she turned and he saw that her face had the appearance of a gourd. At this instant, she disappeared under the arches that surround the washbasins of the tank. He felt a chill invade his body and his legs felt as heavy as lead as he immediately turned and ran as fast as he could. 

This story seems true to me based upon what happened many years later to my brother-in-law, Carlos Atilio Bocaletti Gramegno (RSVP). It happened more or less in 1939 or 1940 when my brother-in-law was very much in love. He could not see a broom with a skirt without flirting with it. He was walking alone one night on the street behind the ruins of the Santa Clara Church about half a block from the La Union water tank when he passed a girl dressed in rags with long, flowing hair. He turned to follow her while making flattering talk to her but although she didn’t appear to be walking quickly, the girl gradually increased the distance between them. Finally they walked about five blocks until they came to the lonely street behind the ruins of the San Francisco Church that leads to the Church of Belén. When he was at the point of catching up with her, the woman disappeared. At that moment, my brother-in-law felt a sensation of fear and his skin was covered in goose bumps. Later than same night, I ran into my brother-in-law, who was still shook-up, and he told me what had happened.

These two events deserve to be taken seriously. The curious thing is the similarity of the two events that took place so close to one another except separated by so many years.

I want to declare that personally I never saw visions or ghosts in the city of Antigua Guatemala despite the fact that, in my childhood and in my youth, I traveled the least-known alleys, highways and streets of the city, including the cemetery, during the nights and at dawn, in search of some vision or ghost that was so much talked about. But, in reality, I saw absolutely nothing supernatural.

My grandfather was a peaceful and humane man, doing favors for the poorest and most needy people. He practiced bloodletting, that is to say, he extracted blood from the veins of people with certain illnesses. He pulled teeth without, of course, anesthesia but certainly with pain. To stop the hemorrhage, they filled the mouths of patients with cheap liquor. He told us that the most difficult tooth he had to pull during the course of his career was that of Mr. Esteban Bran. Mr. Bran, with whom I was familiar, was a tall, dark-skinned man with curly hair and a full beard. He could not pull the tooth. The tooth was so well rooted that my grandfather had to place his knee on the patient’s chest and hold the pliers with both hands until he managed to extract it. Grandfather Juan was also a tailor and barber on a small scale after he retired from the military.

##### The Tannery

My mother, María Morales Mollinedo, was born in the city of Antigua Guatemala on the 14th of May 1869, in the house at the corner of “Sangre de Cristo” and “La Sin Ventura” Streets. The current address is Number 7, 6th Street East. My uncle Fernando Morales Mollinedo was born in the same house on January 6, 1871. I have been told that the house was large and located on a large lot, where there were old tanks and piping, now much deteriorated, for tanning hides. For this reason, the place was given the name “The Tannery”. My mother told me that one night in that house, her brother, my uncle Fernando, saw an opossum. He quickly grabbed it by the tail and called to my mother hold on to it. He placed a candle to shine in the animal’s eyes while he went looking for a club to use to kill it. He returned quickly with a piece of firewood and killed the opossum.

On a certain occasion, Mr. Luis Durán, father-in-law of the engineer Miguel Midence and father of Matilde Durán de Spatz and Carlos and Julio Durán, proposed that my grandparents sell the property to him. They agreed on a price and closed the deal. They say that at that time, Mr. Durán, placed in a bad situation economically, had to mortgage his farm “La Jute” and that he was very close to losing it. However, a short time after having purchased my grandparent’s property, he paid off the mortgage on the farm and saw his finances improve greatly.

There was a rumor going around that the prosperity of the Durán family was due to discovery of a buried treasure on the property that they purchased from my ancestors. To check out the rumor, my mother and Uncle Fernando, still children, entered the property at night and found a hole from which they could see a basement.

Here ends the first part of this disjointed tale. I propose to continue in chronological order so that the new generation will know about our way of living beginning in the first decade of the present century. Although I appear as the protagonist in most of the story, I declare that I am not writing an autobiography. I only want to show the habits and events of that era along with some stories that relate to those things.

### The First Decade: Childhood

#### 1910	

On Ashe Wednesday, February 16, at 12:30AM in the night, the author of this work came into the world. In that same year, and for many weeks, the famous comet Halley was visible. According to what my mother and my sister Marta told me, it was an imposing and beautiful spectacle. Its enormous tail monopolized practically a third of the heavens.

#### 1909/1913 	

England, France, the United States and Holland begin programs of Old Age Security and Health Insurance.

#### 1914	

An event of universal importance that affected my family: July 28 the First World War began, lasting four years and leaving eight million soldiers killed in combat and twelve million civilians killed in attacks on population centers. This war ended with the signing of the armistice on the 11th hour of the 11th day of the 11th month (November 1918).

On the 19th of August, as I have related in the beginning of these recollections, my grandmother Guadalupe Mollinedo de Morales died in the Capital City of Guatemala (Guatemala City).

In this year, the Panama Canal was opened.

#### 1917	

On January 7th, I entered school for the first time. The school was the school for boys, La Enseñanza, opened a year before (1916) on 4th Street West in Antigua, Guatemala, by its Principal and owner, the well-known teacher Don Rafael Rosales, of whom I have fond memories. It was at that time the best school in the city.

Because our house was in the hamlet of San Juan Gascón, four kilometers from the city center, I boarded in the house of Mrs. Aurelia Aragón. She was the aunt of the writer Luis Cardoza y Aragín and of the learned journalist Fernando Juarez y Aragón and grandmother of the journalist Manolo Cotero Aragón. I boarded in that house for five school terms until 1921. Every weekend, my father came on his horse to carry me to San Juan, bring me back every Monday morning.

My father, Rosendo López Herrerra, was the son of Nazario Herrerra and Cármen López. I knew only my grandmother because my grandfather died before I was born. My father had a soap factory in San Juan Gascón. The house was quite large and was located on a small ranch. Since there was no church in the hamlet, the images of the saints were lodged in our house. These consisted of images of Saint John, Saint Anthony, Christ in the Tomb and the Sorrowful Virgin, all life size. Every year, on Holy Tuesday the image of Christ in the Tomb was carried to the Cathedral in Antigua where a Mass was offered. In the afternoon, we left the Cathedral in procession for our house where tamales, bread and coffee was served to the men who carried the image, the musicians in the band and the other people accompanying the procession.

##### Holy Week in Antigua

The city of Antigua was filled with people during the entire Easter season, especially on First Friday and during Holy Week. Thousands of people of all social classes traveled to Antigua for Easter. They came from many Departments of the Republic, the majority of them from the Capital and near-by towns. The richest came in vehicles and the large majority on foot or in ox-carts, in groups that traveled day and night. Those with the most money and those with the most luck lodged in hotels, guesthouses, boarding houses, inns or in houses of friends or relatives. The others, numbering in the hundreds or perhaps thousands of pilgrims or tourists, slept in the porches of the central park, underneath the municipal council chambers and in the palace of the Capitans General. The very poor or less fortunate ones made a place under the carts they had traveled in or simply under the trees of the Calvary, Santa Rosa and Santa Lucía parks, that were filled with fig trees and a tree similar to the mimosa. 

A week before Good Friday, at four o’clock in the morning, the Stations of the Cross of Brother Pedro began at the Church of San Francisco. Carrying the image of Jesús del Perdón, they made the circuit of the streets until they arrived at Calvary Church more or less at six o’clock in the morning where they celebrated a Mass. The majority of the men received communion. There were thousands of quiet men in attendance, meditating silently, stopping at each one of the fourteen Stations of the Cross that were constructed in colonial times along this stretch of road. The Stations of the Cross represent the events of the Passion of Our Lord Jesus Christ. Curiously only men took part in this ceremony because women were prohibited from attending.

Holy Thursday and Holy Friday were days of profound respect and silence. Children were not permitted to play, shout or talk loudly. No one listened to profane music and everyone bathed in silence. No one visited the beaches and church bells were not rung. Enormous wooded rattles were substituted for the church bells. The bells were rung again on Holy Saturday when the Gloria was sung at the first Mass of the day.

##### Holy Week Processions

What follows are two accounts of things that happened around the beginning of the twentieth-century during the processions of the Christ in the Tomb of the hamlet of San Felipe de Jesús.

A well-off family donated a gorgeous glass case for the image of Christ in the Tomb that is on the main altar of the church in San Felipe. When the costly gift arrived, the members of the committee in charge of the Easter celebrations decided that, instead of using the old case they had been using for years, the new case would make its debut in the procession of Holy Friday, when it would be carried on men’s shoulders on the customary circuit. They failed to take into account that the new case was not designed to be portable. It turned out to be too heavy and the struggling men barely managed to reach the Church of Mercy. They carried the case into the church and transferred the image of Christ to the old case that they fetched from San Felipe. In this way, they finished the procession.

One Holy Friday the procession from the School of Christ in Antigua, moving north on 5th Avenue North, encountered the procession from San Felipe de Jesús coming towards the city center. In front of the Aguirre Pharmacy, near the Saint Catalina Archway, both processions stopped and refused to yield the center of the street. There they started to quarrel, first with insults, with each group claiming the right-of-way. Soon they were using their hands. The men from the School of Christ held the lamps they were carrying to light up the Christ and the men from San Felipe held their large wax candles. After hitting each other with the lamps and the candles, both groups climbed onto the sidewalks and continue the march. The following year both organizing committees agreed well in advance that at a certain time the procession from Saint Philip would travel by way of 6th Avenue and the procession from the School of Christ would travel by way of 5th Avenue. This agreement has continued in force until our time.

##### Temples of Minerva

In those days, the end of the school term was celebrated in Temples of Minerva, built in the time of President Estrada Cabrera in each of the Departmental capitals. They were built to be a small version of the Parthenon in Athens, Greece. Today almost none remain. Earthquakes destroyed some and uncomprehending municipal authorities razed others. The largest and the most majesty was the one in the City of Guatemala. It was knocked-down in the period when the engineer Juan Luis Lizarralde acted in the capacity of Mayor in order to build the Enrique Torrebiarte baseball diamond.

On the last Sunday of October, all the public and private schools marched their students to the Temple of Minerva where prizes were given to the best students. The prizes consisted of diplomas and cash money in envelopes bearing the name of the fortunate student. The amount of money was ten pesos for each subject mastered. Also, teachers who had distinguished themselves by their dedication and efficiency were giving prizes in the same way with an envelope containing two or three hundred pesos. The money in those days was the “peso” which was divided into fractional currency of eight “reals”, sixteen “half-reals” and thirty-two fourths of a real. The currency fluctuated between 60 and 70 “pesos” for one US dollar.

After the award ceremony and other ceremonies ended, the students of all the schools marched in turn to large tables where each student received, in this order, one French roll with meat, one paper cornet containing sweets and one glass of horchata (a sweet drink made with rice water). At the end of the table stood a pair of gentlemen with large bundles of new one peso banknotes. They handed two banknotes to each one of the students and in this way the closing ceremonies ended.

Contrary to modern educational practice, the appropriate punishment for offenses committed by students was as follows. The student could be locked in a dark room or made to stand behind the bars of a window in full view of the street. The student would be decked out in two pieces of cardboard in the form of mule ears with the intention that people passing by would see him standing there. Alternately, the student could be hit in the butt with a long stick after stretching the fabric of the pants so that the blow was more painful. He could be made to kneel on grains of corn or made to cling to the top part of a door so as to remain hanging with his feet in the air. If the student slipped down, he had to climb up again after receiving blows with a long stick, etc. Something that was very important in that period and that, in the present day, has disappeared were courses in morals and manners. These consisted of teaching respect for older persons and women in addition to all the good habits that should prevail in the home as in the street.

##### Troubles always come together

On December 7, 1917, on the day before the Feast of Conception, my sisters and I left the house, accompanied by my mother, to cut some flowers. We noticed something different about the way she acted. Sometimes her gaze was unsteady. When we returned, we sat down in the corridor to talk but she was constantly standing up, shaking the skirt of her dress (which was a pale rose color with little white lines) and then sitting down again. This went on for a long time. As was our custom, we drank coffee that afternoon and shortly afterward she went to her room. She lay down and went to sleep. When it was beginning to get dark, she woke up and began to talk incoherently. She was completely deranged. She didn’t recognize anyone. My grandfather Juan, her father, was seated in a chair next to the bed. She kept lovingly rubbing his head and said, “The bald head is so pretty.” She could not stand the sight of me, constantly ordering everyone, “Take that boy out of the room. I don’t want to see him”. Later she stood on the bed and, lifting up her arms, said that she was leaving now and, in her dementia, trying to escape into the attic. 

The next morning, Doctor Juan A. Mejía, a very wise doctor from Honduras, came to see her. After a very careful examination, he ordered that she be washed and given some wafers to eat. On the third day her temperature dropped, she came to her senses and began to improve until she recovered completely.

Since troubles always come together, at midnight on the 24th of December, a strong earthquake leveled Guatemala City. The earthquake was very strong in Antigua as well, collapsing many houses and cracking an infinite number of walls. We spent the rest of the night in the open air since the aftershocks continued for a long time. Shelters were built in the courtyards of all the houses as places of refuge. In the central park of Antigua, temporary structures were built that were large enough to hold the principal government offices. The most important statues from the Catholic churches were moved to temporary structures in the huge courtyards of private homes for the celebration of the Mass and other church functions. In this way, the Cathedral was moved to the house of the Pérez Mollinedo family, Merced Church was moved to the property of the Gonzales family, Calvary Church to a property adjacent to the church, etc. The epicenter of this earthquake was the Jalpatagua fault between Santa Rosa and Cuilapa.

As I mentioned before, mother was still recovering from her recent illness. For this reason, she did not want to spend the night in the courtyard. She stayed in her room most of the time regardless of the constant earthquakes.

### 1918

A major pandemic of the “Spanish Influenza” (the flu) caused 22 million deaths worldwide. As a preventative measure, and to stop the disease, the government ordered that all persons who traveled the streets, without exception, had to use a sanitary mask. The sanitary mask was a strip of white cloth that covered the mouth and nose. The strip of white cloth had ties on the ends that were tied together back of the head or to the ears. 

The strongest shock of the earthquake that started on the 24th of December occurred on the 6th of January. At that moment, I was laying on a mattress outside of the room in pain and with a high temperature because of the flu. When the earthquake occurred at two o’clock in the afternoon, it moved me to and fro, up and down, and in all directions. It was very frightening.

In those days automobiles did not have batteries. The starter was a magneto so it was necessary to use the hand-crank with strength and dexterity to start the motor. The horn was a metal trumpet with a rubber bladder on one end. The trumpet was made to sound by pressing the bladder to put air into it. The carbide lights were fixed in place and there were neither high- nor low beams. When night approached, you had to stop and open the little crystal windows of the lamps in order to turn on the lights. The drivers usually worn riding pants, spatter dashes, gloves, cap, scarf or a beautiful handkerchief tied to the neck and large aviator-style goggles. In Antigua, the first two automobiles were the property of Mr. Alberto Orive and Mr. Manuel Gonzalez, nicknamed Matraca.

### 1919

1919 was, for me, an unforgettable year. On the 19th of June, I accompanied Mother to Guatemala City. It was the first trip I made in a stagecoach. This was a large coach with four wheels pulled by four or six mules. The two lead mules were joined with a collar with small bells that produced marry musical notes. The wagon-driver or coachman distinguished himself with his vile vocabulary, irritating the animals so that they would quicken the pace. We left Antigua at eight o’clock in the morning, carrying as coachman the popular Matías Foronda, a middle-aged skinny man who was very obliging and very vulgar. Since it was the season of rain and paved roads did not yet exist, huge mud holes formed in the highway. All of us passengers had to alight, walk along side of the stagecoach and climb up again after passing over the muddy stretch. At about eleven or ten in the morning, we arrived at San Rafael. The Hortensias, a hotel located between San Lucas Sacatepéquez and Mixco, was constructed entirely of wood. The hotel was a two-story, Swiss-style building surrounded by flowering plants of many colors in full bloom. The mass of so many beautiful flowers and the cool temperature created a hospitable atmosphere. The large dining room was on the first floor. After a leisurely lunch, we continued on our way, arriving at Guatemala City at about five o’clock in the afternoon, two hours later than normal due to the bad condition of the road caused by the intense rain of the season.

We stayed in an unoccupied but furnished house that was the property of Chichi (Isidora) de Soto, a second cousin of Mother. Every thing was a novelty for me. Urban transportation consisted of trolleys pulled by large mules and carriages of different types, ranging from the most common that were pulled by a pair of sorry nags, to the most luxurious belonging to the Shuman stable with large, fine horses, decked-out drivers and footman with black top-hats and white gloves. There was also a little French-made railroad called the Decauville train that traveled on the main ramparts of the city. Many people, mostly workers and servants, boarded cars of the Pacific railroad at the central station and got off at the Pamplona station that was very near where the Trebol is today. This was most common on Sundays and holidays when a special train ran between the Pamplona station in Guatemala City and the lakeside town of Amatitlán.

Coal was used to light public areas. The lighting system consisted of huge lamps attached to the posts by cords that hung from a small pulley. Every day, the lamps had to be lowered to change the coal burned the night before. The coal was replaced and the lamps were again raised to their position. The men doing this work were employed by the electric company and were call “The Lamp Lighters”.

While we were in Guatemala City, we took the opportunity to visit Pancho Mollinedo, an Army general at the brigade level and mom’s cousin. We also visited with the writer and poet Máximo Soto Hall, the godfather of my cousin Fernando Mollinedo Orantes.

It moved me greatly to see that the city was still in a deplorable state of destruction caused by the earthquake that occurred eighteen months before our visit. We returned to Antigua on the 26th of June, having spent a week in Guatemala City.

In those days, the mail was transported between cities by men on foot, usually indigenous men. The porters left both Guatemala City and Antigua at seven o’clock in the morning and arrived at their destinations at two o’clock in the evening, running without stopping. The mail was carried inside a canvas bag that in turn was placed in a rope bag attached to a leather band by ropes. In this way, the trip was made in less time than could a carriage pulled by horses. It was really a marathon run.

### The Second Decade: Apprenticeship

#### 1920	

After governing the country for 22 years, the President of the Republic, the lawyer Dr. Manuel Estrada Cabrera, was overthrown after a bloody fight in which persons of all social classes and both sexes took part. Among the fighters were many young boys who fought in the streets of the city against the army. The majority of the soldiers were indigenous men from Momostenango called “The Momostecos”. I was barely ten years old but I was advised to walk around with “my eyes wide open” and “my ears to the ground”. I kept watch from the highest part of the Cathedral.

A young man of 14 or 15 years of age, Juan Méndez, stationed himself in the central plaza of Antigua armed with a rifle. Sheltered by the pillars of the Palace, he shot at the soldiers. The same thing happened at the house on Fourth Street West where I lived. In front of the ruins of the Church of the Conception, a bullet hit a soldier, pierced his skull and lodged in the door of the house. In collaboration with the Red Cross, a group of volunteer nurses was formed. Among the novice nurses was Blanca Arzú Matheu, a young girl who was the sister-in-law of Mr. Pedro G. Cofiño. The first aid station was installed in the home of Mr. Juan José Pellecer at Fifth Avenue and Fourth Street. When a wounded combatant entered the station, the young Blanca was assigned to attend to him. When she saw that the mangled face of the wounded man, she fainted and had to be attended to before the combatant could be treated. On April 8, Cabrera surrendered and was taken prisoner. Mr. Carlos Herrera was nominated to the Presidency.

#### 1921	

In the early part of the year, my grandfather Juan Morales died and was entombed in a niche at the Cemetery of Antigua. My mother took the position of Principal of the rural school in San Juan Gascón and my sister Amalia took a job as a teacher there. At the end of the year, they quit their jobs and my mother, my sisters Marta and Amalia and I moved to the center of Antigua where we moved into the house of Mrs. Isabel Bethancourt in front of La Union Park. I don’t know why my parents separated. They never again spoke to one another. Ever so often my father would come to see me, at first at school and, in later years, in the places where I worked. Years after the separation, he married Mrs. María Gordiano. After the marriage, we saw less of each other and finally I learned that he had died.

That same year, I made my First Communion in the chapel of the Holy Family Shelter. I spent several months there learning the catechism, receiving classes in doctrine in the afternoons. The group of us spent three days before our First Communion inside the Shelter without leaving. Our mission was to pray and recite the catechism all day.

Weeks later, I became part of the group of acolytes at the Cathedral. My inseparable companions were Porfirio Granados nicknamed the Buzzard, Ernesto Juárez nicknamed Tenderloin, Carlos Mayren nicknamed Shot, Guillermo Jiménez nicknamed Tenpins, and Eduardo González nicknamed Crown. They gave me the nickname of the Dandy. The six of us formed a group or gang and we made ourselves the lords and masters of the Cathedral including the bell tower and the ruins. With the help of the Sacristan Julio Rodríguez, we kept other kids out. Since they had the greatest confidence in me, I was assigned the work of ringing the largest bell every day at twelve noon and at six o’clock in the evening. For this work, they paid me twenty reales a week, worth about two and a half pesos. It was also my job to work the bellows of the organ every day at the six o’clock Morning Mass. The work consisted of moving a rod that was more than three feet long back and forth to pump the bellows so the organ would make sounds. The Cathedral musician, Mr. Eduardo Monzón, was supposed to pay me one peso for each Mass. But days and weeks passed and I saw not even a small piece of the darn salary. Finally, I stopped doing the work. Later he liquidated the debt (that amounted to thirty pesos) but I did not return to the job.

##### 100th Anniversary of Independence

Because it was the one-hundredth anniversary of the independence of Central America, the schools in Antigua organized various cultural events. One of them was an evening of entertainment featuring songs and literature in the Municipal Theatre. I was selected for a minor part in the musical comedy “Gentleman of Nothing” in which my classmate Abraham Pérez (nicknamed Perruco) was the principal actor. Each of the five major schools of Antigua was assigned to represent one of the nations of Central America. My school was assigned to represent Costa Rica. Houses were selected where the production was to be presented. I was part of the choir that sang the National Anthem of Costa Rica in the house at the corner of 6th Avenue and 3rd Street that was the property of Mrs. Clara Duran Mollinedo, the widow of Mr. Matheu and a niece twice removed of my mother.

During the first month of school vacation, I enrolled as an apprentice in the tailor shop of Pedro Sicán Ch. The apprenticeship consisted of sewing on buttons, making buttonholes and practicing sewing stitches by hand on a piece of cloth. I did not find the work agreeable. The next month, I switched to the carpenter’s shop of Mr. Miguel Giorgis, located on the corner opposite the Hospice Church in front of Union Park.

On the 5th of December, President Carlos Herrera was overthrown in a military coup d’etat headed by General José María Orellana. General Orellana took possession of the Presidency on December 6.

#### 1922	

At the beginning of 1922, my mother was named Inspector in the Normal School for Women of Antigua. My sister Marta enrolled in the Singer Academy where Professor María Barbier de Corzo was in charge. She took classes in machine embroidery and cutting and hand sewing of dresses for two years until she received her diploma. I changed schools and enrolled in the Normal School for Men under the direction of Professor Adolfo Vide Urrutia. When the school year ended, I spent my vacation working as an apprentice in the Pablo R. Torres Print Shop without leaving my work at the Cathedral where I continued to be an Acolyte and bell ringer.

Before President Estrada Cabrera was overthrown, General José Barrios, nicknamed Linen Jacket, worked as the political boss or governor of the Department of Sacatepéquez. This man was a true tyrant and extremely abusive. Whatever he wanted, he ordered his men to bring to the Palace of the Captains General, where he lived, without paying for the item. On one occasion, he entered the Muñoz Pharmacy, on the corner opposite the Palace, and, taking out his handkerchief, gave it to the employee at the counter so the employee could smell the perfume on the handkerchief. He said, “Give me a perfume similar to this”. He was talking about a fine French perfume. He put the perfume in his pocket and left without paying for it. 

Mr. Francisco Pérez, a wealthy man who had a reputation for courage, was the owner of a magnificent horse on which he frequently rode through the streets of the city. Unfortunately, Governor “Linen Jacket” fell in love with the horse and sent a message to Don Francisco’s house telling Don Francisco to send the beast to him because he wanted the horse. Mr. Peréz replied that the horse would never leave his house sold, much less as a gift. The following day, two soldiers arrived at the house saying that it was the General’s order that they come and pick up the horse. Don Francisco promptly took the men to the horse’s stall where he pulled out his pistol and told them, “Tell the General that where Francisco Pérez parks his ass, no one else can.” He immediately discharged his gun, putting a bullet into the horse’s head. The horse died instantly. Mr. Pérez then ordered the surprised soldiers to, “Now take the horse to the General”.

Among my daily tasks was to go every morning to buy bread at the bakery of Mrs. Mercedes Ortíz, the widow of Gordillo Ortíz. The bakery was in front of a tavern called “The Dovecot” which is now the Hotel Aurora. My problem was that they gave me a basket and a towel for the bread and, on the way to the bakery I had to go by the corner where the Normal School for Women was located. It would have embarrassed me for anyone to see me with that darn basket. For this reason, I had to get up very early so that the girls would not see me when they entered the school at seven o’clock.

#### 1923	

When this school year ended, my one desire was to be a chauffeur. However, the men at the New Garage, which was the property of Mister Pedro G. Cofiño, told my mother and I that in order for me to be accepted as an apprentice, it was necessary that I learn to be a mechanic first. My mother and I went to the mechanics shop of Mr. Alberto Martínez. He accepted me as an apprentice but I only lasted two weeks. I did not like the work in the blacksmith’s shop. The job involved holding red-hot irons over an anvil with huge pliers while the craftsman shaped the iron with hammers. The hammer blows produced a rain of sparks that fell on my head and arms, leaving me in bad shape with burns.

In the middle of the month of November, I finally committed to work in the Pablo R. Torres Print Shop where Eduardo Hurtarte, between 26 and 28 years old, was the head of the workshop. Enrique Gonzalez and J. Luis Urrutia also worked there along with a boy from Chimaltenango whose name I don’t remember but whose nickname was “El Mirapalgote”. A week after I entered the shop, a contemporary of mine, J. Domingo Méndez Santas, also arrived to train as an apprentice. He ended up working in the shop for more than sixty years. The owners treated him like a member of the family. Their families celebrated their silver and golden wedding anniversaries together. He finally died. What strength! 

The workshop was in the house where the owner Pablo Torres lived. He lived with his wife Mrs. María Estrada and their three daughters: María Luisa, Rosa and Matilde. The three girls learned the graphic arts and worked as compositors or proof editors when necessary. Don Pablo was very strict and always demanded that we be punctual and that we maintain order and neatness in our work. He had the vocabulary of a mule driver and was completely deaf but if we spoke loudly to him he would say to us, “Don’t shout at me, you son of a bitch.” He was very generous and every time there was a religious holiday or whenever a circus came to town, he would make a gift of money to us saying, “Take this for your body or for the circus” and “Now go to hell with you because you are going to leave me with nothing.” I think that to test us frequently money would appear thrown on the floor or on a table but no one would take it. Whoever found the money would always give it to the boss.

##### I die for the Nation

At the end of the year, an event happened that disturbed the whole country. The authorities in the municipality of San Lucas Sacatepéquez discovered a plot headed by an individual named Eleuterio Aspuac whose objective was to overthrow the President of the Republic, General José María Orellana. Many people were detained and, after an investigation, it turned out that ten men who had planned the war were sentenced to death. Of those, six were shot in San Lucas including the leader Aspuac. The other four were held in the jail at Antigua Guatemala. Several weeks had passed since the execution of the first group, when the news came that the four remaining prisoners were going to be shot in the area of the cemetery of Antigua. When the awaited day finally arrived and a large crowd of people congregated in Central Park, at the sound of a trumpet a good number of soldiers begin to march under the command of Capitan Ochaita. In the middle of the soldiers were the four criminals with their arms tied behind their backs with ropes. Naturally, I didn’t miss a detail of the event. The troops left the Town Hall, where the jail is located, and turned onto 5th Avenue. At 5th Street, while still a block from the cemetery, they turned again towards the south and the ruins of the Church of the Holy Spirit. 

Against the wall in front of the church they had placed four wooden benches with a space of more or less six feet between them. The prisoners were made to stand in front of the benches. After a short wait, the secretary of the military tribunal talked about the main steps in the process and then about the sentences. He finished the talk by addressing the public saying, “If anyone shows that they disagree with the sentence or pleads for the prisoners, they will be considered accomplices of the prisoners and will be judged for the same crime.” There was a complete silence. Earlier, the troops had formed up into a square, leaving enough space so that they would not obstruct what was going to happen. After a short wait, the prisoners were blindfolded and made to sit on the benches. A squad of soldiers formed in front of the benches in two lines, the first kneeling and the second standing. The prisoner Daniel Escobar stood up immediately and, taking the blindfold from his eyes, exclaimed, “I want to die standing up and without a blindfold. I die for the nation!” Soon we heard the fatal order, “Attention. Take aim. Fire.” The three that were seated fell forward with bloodstains on their chests. 

At the moment of impact of the bullets, Escobar turned halfway around and fell on his side. Immediately the military officer took out his revolver, approached the executed men and shot each of them in the temple. This was to make certain they were all dead. A doctor promptly appeared and was examining them one by one to certify that they were all dead when it appeared that Escobar was still alive. They called a soldier over and ordered him to shot the prisoner with his rifle. This he did, putting the barrel of his gun to the head and firing. The impact of the bullet completely destroyed the side of the man’s head and the brains flew out and remained stuck on the wall of the ruins of the Church of the Holy Spirit. A wagon pulled by mules and containing four rustic coffins arrived. Two men placed the bodies in the coffins. Upon arriving at the last body, that of Escobar, and after placing it inside the coffin, Julio, the driver of the hospital wagon, collected the brains and the other parts of the destroyed face of the dead man. He wiped his hands on his pants, put the wagon in motion and left in the direction of the cemetery. In this way, everything concluded.

#### 1924	

Mother quit the job of Inspector of the Normal School for Women because the work required a lot of sacrifice on her part. She worked all day and then had to sleep at the school to watch over the dormitory at night. Before leaving her job, she applied to be the Principal of the Primary School in the municipality of San Juan del Obispo. In January of 1924, she was named Principal and my sister Amalia was hired as a teacher in the same school. Every morning the two women walked to the school and returned in the evening.

July 25 was a historical date. That day was the 400th anniversary of the founding of the town of Santiago de los Caballeros. The town was founded on July 25, 1524 in Iximche, the capital of the Cakchiquel Mayan nation. 

Three years later the town was moved to Almolonga Valley (known today as Cuidad Vieja or Old City) but, because of floods caused by water overflowing from the crater of the volcano Agua, it was moved to the Panchoy Valley (present-day Antigua Guatemala) in 1543. The Santa Marta earthquake destroyed the town on July 29, 1773, and it was rebuilt on the site it now occupies in the Ermita Valley. It became the Capital City in 1779 with the name of Guatemala de la Asuncion.

Central Park of Antigua was remodeled for the anniversary celebrations. Its dirt streets were paved with cement bricks. The bricks had to be cut into small pieces to form curves at the street corners. Interestingly, the masons of Antigua had never placed bricks in curved lines so they contracted masons from Mixco. The master mason Faustino Ibañez headed up and finished the work. He continued to live and work in Antigua afterward. He worked in the Eagle tile factory that was the property of two brothers, Arturo and José Matheu Durán.

Cement benches were donated to the same park. The benches were lighted with Colonial-style lamps mounted on iron posts. In the middle of the park was a kiosk where there were marimba concerts on Mondays. From eight o’clock in the evening until ten o’clock on Thursdays and from four o’clock until six o’clock in the afternoon on Sundays, there were concerts by the City Band. During the remodeling work, the kiosk was demolished and it was discovered that the kiosk had been built over a beautiful colonial-era fountain called Santa Cecilia. The fountain was still in good shape. Under-water reflectors illuminated the fountain and its beauty can still be appreciated today. The Philips Company donated the materials and labor to install the lights.

At the beginning of the 20th Century, the park was surrounded with old gravilea trees. Later those trees were cut down and replaced with jacaranda trees that are covered with purple lilac-colored flowers. Finally, those trees were dug up to plant the perote trees that exist today. During that time, General Carlos Jurado was serving as the political boss or governor of the Department. He was much loved and fondly remembered for his respect for the citizens and magnificent work while governor. The lieutenant governor was City Mayor Mr. Lisandro Díaz. Mr. Díaz was an honorable and honest man and father of my friends and companions: Julio, Rafael, Abraham, Lisandro and Ricardo.

##### Raw Sugar

The President of the Republic was Division General José María Orellana, given the alias of Raw Sugar because of his brown skin. This government changed the currency from the devalued peso to the Quetzal, a very solid currency that for many decades stayed at par with the US dollar. After the change only the Central Bank of Guatemala could issue money. This change occurred in 1925. Before that many banks issued their own money that was accepted as legal currency. I still remember the bank notes of the Bank of the West, the Columbian Bank and the International Bank. For a few years after the Quetzal was issued, copper coins of ½ cent, silver coins with a value of 50 cents, paper money worth two Quetzals, and gold coins of five, ten and twenty Quetzals all circulated. Now this currency has all disappeared with the result that the newer generations of people never see those coins. 

President Orellana was a cheerful man. He had much affection for Antigua and on many occasions mixed with the people. I remember two occasions when he attended dances at the Municipal Theatre located at the University of San Carlos Borromeo, now the Colonial Museum. At both dances I was given the job, along with my friend Enrique Gonzalez “Chebo Cola”, of watching over the men’s jackets. Some military men brought us the cape and military hat of the President. I put them on and walked around the room while wearing the garments causing my friend to laugh. Of course, these dances were attended by the most illustrious figures in the society of Antigua. There was a girl of eighteen or twenty years of age, Romelia Vielman Coronado. She was nicknamed the Child although she was quite tall and full-grown. But she was vain and insolent. Whenever she went to a party, very few boys danced with her so she spent most of the time seated. However, in the case of the two dances that President Orellana attended, the Child was his first dance partner. This raised her approval rating and excited the envy of the other girls at the dance.

#### 1925	

During this year, I learned the graphic arts. I became perfectly acquainted with the work of printing in that shop. I learned how to do the job of the pressman that consists of making impressions by machine. I also learned the job of compositor that consists of the assembling of the plates by hand.

On February 16, I was 15 years old. In accord with the customs of the day, I stopped wearing short pants that came to the knee. I also stopped wearing the long socks that were supported by an elastic cord above the knee. The adolescent boy now felt completely like a man because to complement the long pants were a long-sleeve shirt, a tie and a jacket.

President Orellana was the owner of the farm called the Inns (Los Aposentos) that was located in the Department of Chimaltenango near Tejar. To shorten the distance, he ordered the construction of a highway that connected the towns of Parramos, San Luis de las Carretas, Pastores, Jocotenango and Antigua Guatemala. At the inauguration of this highway, his cabinet and other high personalities of the government accompanied the President. The conclusion of the festivities took place in the Hotel Manchén that has since been converted into the “Elisa Martinez” maturity hospital. (Elisa Martinez de Arévalo, the wife of the President of the Republic Dr. Juan José Arévalo, founded this hospital.) The cameraman, Mr. Carlos Matheu, arrived to cover the event. Because I never missed any important event, I ended up being the porter of the movie picture camera of Mr. Matheu that was mounted on a tripod. For sure I did not miss a single detail of the celebration and I was able to get some of the delicacies and drinks that were distributed so abundantly in the hotel. In this way, I was paid for the service of carrying the camera. 

I always tried to earn extra money apart from my job in the print shop. The owner Don Pablo had many used books, mostly well-preserved novels. He gave them to me to sell in the evenings after I left work. I walked around the city offering them for sale door to door. I sold a good quantity and received my commission. Almost all of the salary I earned in the print shop was used to help with the expenses of the house. The extra money received from other activities was for my own amusements and for snack foods.

The era of the radio began. The first people in Antigua to possess radios were Mr. Alberto Oribe and the Priest Eugenio Novi, Pastor of the School of Christ Church. The radio apparatus were rectangular boxes that contained 2, 4 or 6 earphones each. People that wanted to listen to the transmission had to put on a pair of the earphones. If you didn’t do this, you couldn’t hear anything. With this primitive system, the neighbors lived very tranquil and slept in peace. It is too bad that the advances of the modern age oblige us to listen to what we do not wish to hear.

The house were we lived was very large. My mother rented two rooms. The family of San Martín Jilotepeque rented two others and the owner Mister Joaquin Arroyave and his two daughters María and Rebecca occupied the rest. The house rules were very strict. Nine o’clock at night was the curfew. A prop was placed against the entrance door and no one could enter or leave. Although one knocked on the door many times, there was no one to open the door. Sometimes I went to the movie house to see a good movie and stayed out past the time to arrive at the house. For lack of funds to pay the entrance fee at the movie theater, I took advantage of the friendship that I had with the marimba players who enlivened the silent theaters of the period. Sometimes Manuel Silva, who played the drums and other times Manuel Samayoa, who performed on the violin, would give me an instrument so I could enter the theater with the band. In this way, I watched the movies free or better said I watched part of the movie. The event started at eight o’clock. In order to get to the house before they closed the door, I would leave the movie before nine o’clock. 

When I stayed out past the hour of the curfew, I left immediately in search of Julio the sacristan who could be found drinking chocolate in El Infiernito juice bar every night. I would tell him my tragic story and he would immediately give me the key to the Cathedral. I would pass the night there without any company other than the Saints of the Church and the souls in Purgatory. These would find me in the Sacristy lying on a rolled-up carpet. I would sleep until 5:30AM when Julio would arrive to open the building.

#### 1926	

The Scottish inventor John Logie Baird produced the first television images.

Mr. Mario Divizza de Monteforte, father of the writer Mario Monteforte Toledo, lived in the two-story house in front of the Torres Print Shop. The son was a year younger than I. The older Mr. Monteforte was a stamp collector and frequently arrived at the print shop carrying new postage stamps, printing inks of different colors and small frames to be used to print on a certain place on the stamp. This was very delicate and laborious work so that when one was doing the work one became nervous because of the close presence of Mr. Monteforte who stood at one’s side saying, “Be very careful with these stamps because they are very rare and valuable”, etc. None of us wanted to do the work but, regardless, whoever was told to do it had to. Mr. Monteforte was given the name The Count. He was a man of normal height, thin and very pale. He always seemed nervous because his hands trembled giving the impression that he was a drug addict.

On September 26, President José María Orellana arrived in Antigua and stayed at the Hotel Manchén, as was his custom. Early the next day, the news made the rounds that the President had suffered an attack of angina that made him so sick that they immediately took him to the Guatemala City but that he died on route. This was the official story. But the wagging tongues said that the President died from poison in the food of the hotel. According to the rumors, he died in the hotel and the corpse was being carried secretly to the capital to give the impression that he was still alive. This was supposed to prevent a political scandal. The First Designate General Lázaro Chacon assumed the Presidency.

My sister Amalia, who was twenty year old, was the victim of an attack of typhoid fever. Doctor Jorge E. Alvarado, a young man from Quetzaltenango, who had recently arrived in Antigua with the reputation of being a very good doctor, attended to her. He struggled for 18 days to cure the illness. This was not possible principally because at that time antibiotics did not exist. In addition to medicines, the treatment consisted principally of applying bags of ice to lower her body temperature. On some days, her temperature was higher than 41 degrees Centigrade. In Antigua there was no ice factory and ice had to be brought from Escuintla. When Uncle Fernando, who was located in the Capital, knew this he sent a hundred pounds of ice but all was in vain. The doctor said that if she survived 21 days, with a crisis every 7 days, there was a possibility of a cure. But unfortunately she died 18 days after the onset of the disease 3 days before completing the 21 days that the doctor said would be her salvation.

#### 1927	

The movie from the United States “The Jazz Singer” was the first great success of the movies with sound.

By this time, the group of acolytes at the Cathedral had disappeared: Ernesto Juarez (Tenderloin), who was the strongest, was attacked by I don’t know what disease and died while an adolescent. Porfirio (the Buzzard), Eduardo (Crown) and Carlos (Shot) all moved to the Capital City to study music in the Substitute’s School. The first graduated as first flutist, joined the Antigua Municipal Band and years later occupied the position of head musician. The second graduated in percussion instruments, joined the same band but he did not last long because he died while still young. Finally, the third became a great performer on the contrabass violin and was sought after by the best marimba bands of Antigua and the Capital.

In Antigua, there lived a boy of humble origins named José Marroquín, nicknamed Chúchumas. He was very popular because of his happy and helpful character. He was by profession a shoe shiner. He had installed a well-equipped shine parlor on the main commercial street of the city on 5th Avenue North in the neighborhood of Central Park. At first, he installed in the shop two small showcases that hung from the wall containing a few pairs of shoes, handkerchiefs and ties. Later, he hung two or three shirts in the shop. He was very thrifty, honorable and without vices. Someone suggested that he put in a shop. With his savings and good reputation, he secured credit, rented a large storefront in front of the shoeshine parlor and opened a store with the name of Marroquín Bazaar. In a relatively short time his store became one of the largest stores in the city, stocked with merchandise imported directly from the country of origin. He sold French perfumes, fine toys from Germany and a good assortment of clothing, cloth and various items. He and his two sisters attended to the store. 

Because of the friendship between us, he contracted me together with my friend Guillermo Jiménez (Tenpins) to assemble a number of little automobiles with pedals that arrived from Germany. The work was done perfectly and we earned a few Quetzals. I want to tell you of the end of the Marroquín Bazaar. Right after the Great Depression of the years 1929-1930, the trade declined until finally the shelves were full of empty boxes. Finally, he went broke and poor Chúchumas left to live in the Capital.

#### 1928	

The Scottish bacteriologist Alexander Fleming discovered the antibiotic properties of penicillin. In 1940, Howard Florey and E. B. Chain succeeded in isolating penicillin in their laboratory at Oxford, England and demonstrated that it was effective against bacteria. They proved that penicillin could be administered without any danger orally, by injection or directly on wounds in the form of power. The three scientists obtained the Nobel Prize of 1945 for this work.

At the beginning of the year, and after working for five years in the Torres Print Shop, I was offered work in one of the two largest stores in Antigua, the store of “José R. Matheu Sucesores” located on 4th Street West and 6th Avenue North on the corner of Central Park. This store sold fine wines and spirits imported from France, Spain, Portugal, Italy, Germany and Canada in addition to domestic liquors. The hardware section sold imported galvanized metal and Belgian shotguns, iron tools and nails for shoeing mules and horses from Switzerland, iron piping and galvanized iron accessories, machetes, hues, spades, etc. as well as barbed wire from England. Scissors, sharpening stones and many articles of the prestigious Henckel brand, whose emblem is a pair of little men, were imported from Germany. To the fur shop came fine pelts from Canada, from Germany and England nails, screws and tools for carpenters, masons, etc. From the United States and other countries came rifles, pistols, bullets, gunpowder and ammunition. The store also sold tobacco, glass of all sizes, paper goods and writing and school supplies, bushes of all kinds, tooth paste, toilet soap, etc.

To those who feel the above list overly long; I would say that I wrote it with the intention of informing them about all the specialties involved in my new job. The job was a school where I acquired practical skills so useful later in life. The salary that I received was twenty Quetzals per month that was not bad for that time.

My mother was tired of the daily trips that she made to San Juan del Obispo as Principal of the school there. For this reason, she quit her job and spent her time at home sewing canvas pants. The pants came from a Chinese-owned store and were sent to her already cut. They paid her by the dozen, at a piece rate that was very low.
	
#### 1929	

The worldwide economic Great Depression (1929-1934) began at the end of this year. Banks went bankrupt. Millions of people lost their savings deposited in the banks and were left practically in the streets. Great industrial companies likewise declared that they were broke and closed their businesses with the subsequent increase in unemployment.

### The Third Decade: School Overseer

#### 1930	

The worldwide economic crisis sharpened. The number of unemployed people in the world was alarming. People could not find even the most insignificant of jobs. Absolutely all commodities were falling in value without warning. The stores that had strong inventories were hurt the worst because they had to sell their merchandise at prices much below their cost. For this reason, the store where I worked decided that it was necessary to reduce its staff. The store’s staff consisted of ten employees. The three most recent hires, of which I was one, were let go. I looked for work everywhere without finding anything. 

##### Uncle Fernando Mollinedo

Finally, I went to Guatemala City and lived for a year in the house of my uncle Fernando Mollinedo. His household at Number 42, 3rd Avenue South, consisted of his wife Mrs. Matilde Castillo Orantes and his children Fernando, Matilde and María Amalia. His oldest daughter Josefina lived with her husband Mr. Vitalino Molina at the Graciela farm located in Canchón, near Port Parada on the highway to El Salvador. They had a breeding herd of milk cows. Each cow had its own name. To milk the cows, they called them by name and the cows came in single file to their milking station. I spent a month on that farm. Germán, the oldest son of Josefina, was five years old. The next year all of the family moved to the Capital so he could start school. They bought a beautiful house on 3rd Avenue South in front of that of my uncle Fernando.

The family of Uncle Fernando was very orderly and well mannered. The girls were very studious. In addition to their school studies, they had magnificent music teachers. Matildita studied piano and Amalita studied violin. Uncle Fernando had the job of Vice-Minister or Sub-Secretary of Agriculture. The Minister was Mr. Manuel María Herrera but my uncle attended to almost all of the work of the Ministry on account of his gift of dealing with people and his training. All the people looking for a solution to their problems went to see my uncle because of his patience and soft manners. No one left him feeling robbed. 

During this time, there was a great scarcity of corn and wheat flour in the country due to the Depression. Uncle Fernando contracted, on behalf of the Ministry, an expert baker to produce economical and good tasting bread that was made with a little flour mixed with agricultural products that were cheap and easy to find in Guatemala. The contractor was more or less 45 years old, very active and well respected. He began his work making some mixtures of wheat flour with cassava, others with sweet potatoes or with Irish potatoes. From every batch he baked, he presented a sample to my uncle Fernando so he could give his opinion. On many occasions he brought the samples to the house to taste them in the company of his family. He wanted to be certain that they were tasty. After this experiment, the master baker taught some of his colleagues so that they could put the idea into practice in the bakeries where they worked. 

Time continued its march and I continued without a job until, one day, we learned that a print shop needed a typographer. Quickly my cousin Matilde went with me and we went to the shop. We spoke with the owner Mr. Rafael Rodel who, after some questions, told me to come back the next day. The job consisted of putting together a newspaper called “The National”. Mr. Rodel was a very good person and was satisfied with my work but the good times did not last very long. After a few months, they closed the newspaper for reasons unknown to me and there the thing ended.

The house of Uncle Fernando was fairly large. It had three courtyards. Around the first were the bedrooms with the dining room in the back. A giant rosebush covered a good part of the courtyard and the columns that surrounded the entrance hall supported a grape vine. In the second courtyard was a small fountain attached to the wall. Very near to it was a small guava tree that produced abundant fruit that was red both in and out and had an agreeable acidic flavor. I have never in my life seen another tree of that variety. Around the same courtyard there was a kitchen, a large basin for washing clothes and a clothesline where wet clothing received the rays of the sun from all sides and dried quickly. In the third courtyard was a large cherry tree that produced a grand quantity of very sweet fruit. There were also chickens, a small fountain of water and rooms for the servants.

Frequently I accompanied my cousin Nando (Fernando Junior) to walk through little towns bordering the city. These towns included Elena Avenue, Pigeon Plains and the Quarry. Nowadays all of these places are densely packed neighborhoods in the heart of Guatemala City. Many friends of Nando came to the house. I remember some. They included the Cruz brothers, Mario Forno and Hachito Cabrera the son of the Learned Honorable Abraham Cabrera, the Minister of Public Education. Also the close friend and companion of Nando, Humberto Lemus Pivaral, came frequently. He and Nando lived together in the same house when they both studied in the United States. By the bye, they said that Nando had a telescope and spent his free time observing a naked girl who sun-bathed on the terrace of a house nearby. This is the reason why they stuck Nando with the affectionate nickname of Teles. 

I heard another story from the same time when they were studying in the United States. His friend Lemus Pivaral, son of a wealth family and who had brown skin and black eyes, found himself intrigued with the idea of passing himself off as a Hindu prince. He walked around wearing a cape and a turbine that he bought in a store. He dressed Nando in a vulgar suit and Nando pretended to be his page.

During this time, the first movie with a soundtrack to arrive in Guatemala was screened at the Capital theatre. Its name was “The Song of the Wolf”. Some time later, the same theatre showed the first movie spoken in Spanish, “This is the life”, filmed in Argentina, with José Bor as the protagonist. I was present at both screenings.

On December 12, General Manuel Orellana, who assumed the Presidency after the resignation of General Lázaro Chacón, turned over the office to Mr. José María Reina Andrade for health reasons. General Orellana assumed the office out-of-turn and governed for only 15 days before he submitted his resignation. 

#### 1931	

Everything eventually comes to an end. One day, I received notice from Mother, calling me to move back to Antigua, because the Electric Company had a vacant position. The deal was that on the corner of Central Park, 5th Avenue and 4th Street, construction had begun on a building of two-stories suited for a store and offices on the ground floor and apartments on the second floor. The image of the Electric Company was changing. Previously, the office was located in an old house situated on the corner of 6th Avenue and 6th Street that is now occupied by the Old Folks Home. Really, it was the cashier of the Company, Angel Velázquez, an old friend of my youth, who proposed that I accept the position of storekeeper. I accepted the job. The salary was Q.25.00 monthly with life insurance and other benefits. (On February 14, General Jorge Ubico Castañeda assumed the Presidency.)
	
#### 1932	

The job of storekeeper with the Electric Company lasted barely two years. When construction of the new building was finished, the materials storeroom disappeared and I was left without a job once again. This time I was only unemployed for a few weeks.

In Antigua there was a store owned by an elderly woman called Ms. Naya Díaz. Most of the merchandise in the store was thread of all types and colors. They also specialized in leather for shoes, rubber soles and heels and everything that concerned shoemaking. The business was run by its owner and, more importantly, by her nephew Alfonso Díaz who suddenly became gravely ill. For this reason, they spoke to me about working in the store during the time that Alfonso was sick. It was six months before he was completely cured.

#### 1933	

I had good luck because about that time I was told that I could find work in the Normal School for Boys. I went and talked with the Principal, the teacher Mr. Abraham Orantes, who said that the only vacant position open at the time was that of janitor. However, it was likely that a better position would come open shortly. So it is that I was the janitor for three months after which I rose to Third Inspector. I received my appointment from the Ministry of Public Education. My job description was the following.

I was to monitor the coming and going of the professors. For this purpose, there were large sheets of paper, perforated and bound so as to form a book which each professor signed, noting the time the class started, the subject and the type of classroom activities used. These sheets were printed and had ruled columns for entering the notations. One sheet was used per day for all the classes and the sheets were bound at the end of the year so they could be archived. Each class was 45 minutes long plus ten minutes for recess and five for lining up to enter and leave the classroom, in all one hour.

I was also expected to ring the bell at the beginning and end of the classes and monitor the students during the recess so there was order and good behavior and, when necessary, punish violators.

I checked all the classrooms after the recesses to make sure that the teacher was there. In his absence, I had to stay there monitoring the students so they studied in an orderly manner.

After classes let out, the 110 dormitory students remained under the control of the Inspectors for the rest of the day, during study time and supper. At night, at 8:30PM, after roll call, everyone had to be quiet and everyone went to bed. The Inspector on duty had to make sure that each bed was occupied and then sleep in the room with all of the dormitory students so they would stay absolutely quiet and so that no one escaped or left the building.

At five o’clock in the morning, the bell was rung to wake everyone up. Everyone went to the swimming pool to bathe, at six o’clock breakfast was served, at seven o’clock secondary school class began and at eight o’clock primary school classes began.

The salary of the Inspectors was Q.35.00 per month with food and a bed. The primary school teachers earned Q.22.50 per month for 7 hours of work and the secondary school professors earned Q.15.00 per month for each class they taught.

Normally the Inspectors worked in the following manner. Each Inspector took a 24-hour turn as Reserve Guard and then rotated to Exempt Guard. The Exempt Guard had the primary responsibility for the activities of the day such as ringing the bell, checking the teachers in and out and monitoring the meals in the kitchen and the dormitory. The Reserve Guard had to collaborate with, or better said, help the Exempt Guard but he had fewer responsibilities. The Reserve Guard had the evening and the nights off and could leave the premises. The Exempt Guard spent the night in the dormitory with the students. 

At the initiative of Mr. Manuel Méndez, there formed in the city what they called the Artistic Group of Antigua. The Artistic Group was dedicated to theatre activities with a non-profit intent as fans of theatre or perhaps for love of the art. The proceeds of the performances were invested in the expenses of the presentations such as theatre rental, costumes, decorations and equipment in general. The group consisted of the following persons: Director Manuel Méndez; lead actor Jorge Antonio Mansilla; understudy Daniel Morales; supporting roles Jesús López Guillermo Carrilo, Alfonso Marinelli, Julio Juárez, Rogelio Toledo, Ismael Cuyún and others I cannot recall. Of the female sex, the lead actor was Graciela Cáceres, supported by Refugio Velázquez, Consuelo Granados Mollinedo, María Luisa Midence Durán, Rebeca Cáceres, Dolores Martínez Furlán, Ernestina Matute and Elena Buendía. The prompter was Manuel Jonama Cáceres. We presented the dramas “The Stain that Cleans”, “Juan José”, “La Tosca” and “Lazarus the Mute”; the comedy “The Doorknobs of Hotel Amberes” and finally, under the valiant direction and brilliant acting of the well-known and fondly remembered Mr. Alfredo Palarea (RSVP) and his daughters, Lourdes and Lily Palarea Saravia, we presented the work “The Butcher’s Son”.

#### 1934	

Sad and painful news for the Morales family was the woeful death of Uncle Fernando that occurred on February 26. He was the victim of a deadly stroke at three or four o’clock in the afternoon while he was visiting a family in the city of Managua, Nicaragua, where he was the Envoy Extraordinary and Minister Plenipotentiary of the Government of Guatemala. He was assigned to Managua, Nicaragua as the Resident Minister to that country. .

The family informed my mother and I immediately of the unhappy news. Since I was on vacation, I quickly left for Guatemala City. Since the body was to be transported by ship, it was arranged that representatives of the family were to receive the body at the Port of San José. Mr.Vitalino Molina (the husband of my cousin Josefina), Fernando Junior and I were the representatives. We made the trip by train on the morning the ship was to make land fall. The ship arrived at about seven in the morning. The casket was placed inside an aluminum box and this in turn was placed in another box made of wood. The casket was carried in a special rail car along with the three family members and an official committee sent by the government.

Arriving at the Capital, the casket was taken to the house at 3rd Avenue South #42, Zone 1. The casket was placed in the living room, which was quite large, where the body lay in state. The casket was surrounded by an impressive amount of floral offerings sent by various government agencies as well as diplomatic missions and an infinite number of family friends. The Diplomatic and Consular corps, representatives of government and a large number of the public attended the burial at the General Cemetery the following day, March 9.

##### A funeral ovation

The Learned Mr. Alfonso Carrillo gave the following funerary ovation in the name of the government of the Republic.

“Mister Secretaries of State, Honorable Diplomatic Representatives, Gentlemen:

The Government of the Republic has honored me by calling upon me to express its pain occasioned by the death of the honorable Mister Fernando Morales Mollinedo.

One of the loyal, honored and energetic servants of the Nation has died and the Government is profoundly saddened by his loss.

Born in the shelter of the far-reaching political changes resulting from the Liberal Revolution of 1871, Mr. Morales Mollinedo was educated in secular schools. He excelled in the study of the mathematical sciences and in the field of oratory.

He worked with the Learned Mr. Miguel Prem, the outstanding Judge of the Department of Sacatepequez, as his secretary.

He busied himself with the training of the young people with the dedication of a real teacher.

He served in the office of right-of-way of the Railroad of the North.

He founded a model home with his dignified wife, Mrs. Matilde Castillos Orantes. Their four children were exposed to healthy models of honor, love of work and the performance of duty.

The Secretary of Development counted him among his employees.

The Political Heads (Governors) of the Departments of Guatemala, el Quiche and Sacatepequez employed him as their Secretary.

He occupied the position of Sub-Secretary of Agriculture for more than six years.

The Diplomatic and Consular Corps of Guatemala called him to Foreign Service: he represented the Government of this Republic at the Corinth Conferences; he was Consul General of Guatemala in Tegucigalpa and then ascending by virtue of his merits of energy and competence to the post of plenipotentiary. He accepted a diplomatic posting to the Government of El Salvador. And, finally, he was named Resident Minister to the Government of Nicaragua.

His dedication to his work, his loyalty and his efficiency, assured his rise to the category of Envoy Extraordinary and Minister Plenipotentiary. Here he was surprised by death that came quickly and cut short his industrious existence at the age of 63.

The learned sister Government paid him posthumous honors, which the people of Managua, the country’s pretty capital city, joined in, as a demonstration of their usual honorable behavior and the high regard that Mr. Morales Mollinedo had won in discharging the diplomatic mission that our Government had charged to him, which he conducted so ably.

The people and the Government of Guatemala are appreciative of the people and Government of our sister country Nicaragua for the remarkable demonstration of brotherhood and good manners that were manifest on the occasion of this regrettable death.

Finally then, in brief, the public life of this honest, loyal and energetic (government) functionary, in the varied public offices that he occupied, set an example of how one can be of good service to the Fatherland.

Naturally the disappearance of men of this caliber is the cause of profound sorrow and the affliction that has come upon the Government, the family and the Nation is justified.”

A few days after the death of Uncle Fernando, my mother suffered an attack of facial paralysis. Doctor Jorge E. Alvarado treated her. The illness lasted for more or less one year. The treatment consisted of applications of ultraviolet rays. For a certain period of time, she was taking strychnine in increasing and then decreasing doses until she recovered her heath completely.

At the school, the Inspectors had free time during the school hours if the faculty all came to work. That was often the case because of the timeliness and discipline that prevailed in those days. For this reason, the principal Professor Orantes authorized me to audit classes with the right to take the exam at the end of the year. In this way, I passed the first year of normal school.

#### 1935	

The English physicist Robert Watson invented Radar (1935-1939).

Mr. Abraham Orantes, the Principal of the Normal School where I worked, was one of the great Guatemalan teachers of his era. During the presidency of General José María Orellana, four of the best teachers of the country were awarded opportunity scholarships to study for their Doctorate of Pedagogy. Firstly, Professor Juan José Arévalo Bermejo went to Argentina where he obtained the title of Doctor of Philosophy. He remained in that country lending his services as Professor at the University of Tucuman. Years later, he occupied the Presidency of the Republic of Guatemala during the six-year term of 1945-1951. Secondly, Professor Luis Martínez was assigned to Switzerland where he earned his Doctorate. Later he was the Minister of Public Education in Guatemala. Thirdly, Professor Adolfo Monsanto was sent to the Autonomous University of Mexico D.F. where he earned his Doctorate and some time later also occupied the job of Minister of Public Education of Guatemala. Finally, Professor Abraham Orantes had his turn to study towards a Doctorate at the University of Havana, Cuba. He did not receive his Doctor’s degree but I never knew why.

##### The River overflowed

On Sunday October 9 a catastrophe occurred in the City of Antigua. At noon, it rained heavily. In the afternoon, the sky cleared and the sun came out. At about 4:30PM in the afternoon, a strong current of water started to flow down Fourth Street West. At that moment my girlfriend, Elisa Bocaletti, who years later became my wife, was with me. We were in the doorway of the house of our friends Julia and María Ruiz that was located precisely on Fourth Street West two blocks from Central Park. Suddenly, we saw the flow of muddy water increase rapidly in volume until it reached the edge of the sidewalk. At this moment, General Enrique Girón, the Departmental Governor, passed in front of us wearing a raincoat and boots that came up to his knees. He yelled at all the men he encountered, “Follow me to lend your hand because the Pensativo River has left its banks at the Matasano Bridge.” I didn’t need to be told twice. At this moment, some friends passed by and I attached myself to them. Meanwhile, the water increased constantly and began to enter the houses. Panic spread quickly. My girlfriend and her friends screamed and begged me not to go to the bridge because something bad could happen to me. But I, full of courage and patriotism, rolled up my pants legs to above my knees and…like ducks to water…I ran off with my friends. We had walked, or better said paddled, a little more than a half a block when we came across a cable tied to the post on the corner to the balcony of a house on the opposite side. Someone had put it there so he could cross the street. Hanging on the cable, we managed to cross to the other side and, taking 2nd Avenue we arrived at 3rd Street where the current was weaker until we arrived at the place of the disaster. 

I cannot to this day erase from my mind the scene that presented itself. The water from the river had completely covered the arch of the bridge (that dated from colonial times) and was flowing onto the city streets. The cause was an enormous eucalyptus tree that had blocked the mouth of the bridge. Felipe Efrain Díaz, a good friend of mine although he was older, stood out among a group of people, who wearing only their underwear, were working in the water. They were pulling out branches and other objects that prevented the current from moving freely. He stood out because of tenacity of his work. He usually sported a large and well-grown mustache but now it had become a huge chunk of mud. His mustache and his small black but reddening eyes were all that one could see of his brown face. Without resting and with great tenacity, he repeatedly dove into the muddy water trying to find an appropriate place to tie the cable that he held in his hand. The opposite end of the cable was attached to a giant Mack truck, the property of Mister Julio Godoy (the son-in-law of Mister Pedro G. Cofiño). He was finally rewarded for his efforts when, as nightfall approached, he found his objective. Little by little, the motor of the heavy truck accelerated and pulled the enormous tree that blocked the passage of the river. Slowly the blockage was removed. The truck’s crew shouted to everyone to clear the area before the water could swallow them. Immediately, everyone of the rescue party left the water. When the tree that was blocking up the river was removed, the black water flowed noisily in its normal course. Of course, all those who arrived late could only watch without either pain or glory although, as the saying goes, “Good intentions are enough.” 

The next morning, the panorama of the city was not encouraging, especially the streets and avenues where the water had passed. These were covered from side to side with a thick layer of sand. Central Park was in the same shape. Thank goodness, the authorities took the appropriate measures. Early in the morning, they issued a proclamation calling on all of the men older than 18 to present themselves at Central Park where they were organized into work gangs to rid the city of the sand that had invaded it. They selected an uncultivated lot adjoining Wide Street where the blacksmith’s shops are, in the neighborhood of the road that goes to the small town of San Felipe de Jesús. This lot was practically a ravine that had been converted into a garbage dump. It was a perfect place to put the sand because it was near where the sand was.

By the order of General Jorge Ubico Castañeda, President of the Republic, all of the owners of trucks in the municipality of Mixco and places bordering Antigua had to make their vehicles available to carry the sand. Early Tuesday morning the center of the city was crowded with men offering their help. The authorities formed a committee to organize the work and men began to load and unload the trucks using shovels, hoes and wheelbarrows. The authorities thanked all the people that were left over after having organized the work and sent them home. 

The number of vehicles was enormous. Everyone was assigned their task, some loading the trucks, others unloading the trucks and others spreading the sand where it was supposed to go. The sand was placed to form a flat and firm rectangle that later on became the base for the construction of Pensive Stadium that until this date has been the scene of school events, principally soccer games. After two weeks of hard work, the city was free of residue.

##### Jocotenango Fair

For the past century, the Jocotenango Fair was celebrated in Guatemala City during the week of August 15. The fair was also called Asuncion Fair in honor of the Holy Virgin, the City’s patron saint. The character of the fair changed over time but it was a major market for venders from all over Guatemala. All of the festivities took place in the northern part of the City.

After 1934, during the administration of General Ubico (whose birthday was on November 10), an ostentatious fair was organized during November. Large buildings were built to house the international expositions, all connected by wide corridors. A stadium and a bullring were also built. This fair took place on the grounds of the Aurora national property near the zoological park in the southern part of Guatemala City. In comparison to these celebrations, the traditional fair of Jocotenango sank to second place until it came to the point of almost disappearing.

#### 1936	

In one of the November fairs, an exposition was staged that defamed our indigenous race. It was an undertaking of the then young Mario Monteforte Toledo who was later a professor at the Autonomous University of Mexico. He was later exiled to Mexico and is now an honorable writer, retired from politics and living once again in Guatemala.

On a date I don’t remember, the young aforementioned Monteforte, with a lot of publicity and boasting about his valiant adventure in northern Guatemala, said that he had lived in the Petén jungle where he found a small Lacandon community. He carried 8 or 10 of those Indians by air to the Capital of Guatemala either voluntarily or by force (I don’t know which) and, to the country’s shame, located them in an improvised hamlet built inside the Aurora Fairgrounds in order to exhibit them to the public. After paying for the necessary ticket, almost as if they were rare animals, one could see the sorry spectacle of the small group of Lacandons. They were dressed in a long shirt of coarse white cotton cloth that covered them to the mid-point of the legs, their collar closed, their sleeves hanging to below the elbow, their long and uncombed hair and their feet clad in small leather sandals. Looking sad and distracted, they could see the hundreds of curious people who paid to see them. Some of the visitors asked them questions that were not answered because the Lacandons did not understand the language of Cervantes. There was no shortage of people who gave them medals, not the valuable kind, but religious medals to which the poor afflicted men paid no attention nor had any idea of what they were. At the end of the two-week fair, the news spread that some of the poor fellow-citizens were sick and they were hurriedly returned to their community in the Petén jungle of northern Guatemala by airplane just as they had come.

##### Working for script

I continued my daily labor at the school in Antigua. First Inspector Professor Raul Morales was named Professor of several fields of study, Professor Fermin Vielman Muñiz rose to First Inspector, I rose to Second Inspector and the Army Major Luis Morales Chacón was named Third Inspector. Something that I forgot to say is that from the time I started working at the School in 1933, the salaries were never paid on time. The reason was that when General Jorge Ubico came to power in 1931, the national coffers were found to be completely empty as a consequence of the worldwide depression that afflicted the country. Consequently months passed without us receiving our pay. 

Three times a year, sometime before Holy Week, the 15th of September and Christmas, the Departmental Revenue Administration asked us to present our last pay slip, that is, the most recent of those that had been given to us. Upon arriving at the office, the clerk said to us, “For lack of funds we can only give you five Quetzals on the account.” We put up with this routine for several years so we lived off the fabulous sum of fifteen Quetzals per year. It was an odyssey. My patient readers might ask themselves, “How is it possible that the teachers would put up with this situation?” “Where did they get the wherewithal to feed and cloth themselves and find lodging?” Very simply, in the very Noble and Loyal City of Saint James of the Knights and precisely on the same block on 4th Street between 5th and 6th Avenues there were three commercial establishments. One belonged to a Jewish man named Alberto Balterisky, the second to a Protestant named Professor Francisco Ramírez (better known as Mr. Pancho Gűicoy) and the third the music agency J.G. Alvarenga. The two non-Catholic merchants sold cloth, ready-made and custom clothing, shoes, hats, shirts and merchandise in general. The business of the Alvarenga Agency was the sale of General Electric radios, records and everything in that line with the exception of televisions and cassettes. The latter two items did not yet exist.

All or almost all of the employees of the Department of Education went to these commercial houses to exchange some of their pay slips for merchandise that they needed. The only requirement was that the sale price was increased 60% as a type of commission for the favor that the merchants were doing to accept the devalued pay slips in exchange for valuable merchandise. In this way, the martyr had to cloth himself. Any extra articles of clothing that weren’t absolutely necessary were sold to someone else for less than their real value. In this way, the original loss was made even greater but at least one had money for one’s other expenses.

The administrator of the Departmental Revenue office was the ominous Mr. José María Lira, a very haughty man who lacked a conscience. Every week, he paid the three aforementioned businessmen for our pay slips in cash after a small discount. Of course, everything was done under the table so that the hundreds of persons who were swindled did not know about the dirty business that produced huge profits. Although everything was an open secret, no one dared to denounce the business because of fear of reprisal.

#### 1937	

The cashier Rafael Meléndez Escobar, who was from Quetzaltenango, was the only one of the school personnel who never lacked for money. During the school year, the students would ask him for copies of their exam grades and for help with their graduating thesis and other similar things. He always boasted in front of his very poor co-workers, such as the overseers or primary school teachers, that he always had cash money although of course in very modest sums. But he was always laughing at us because he thought that he was superior to the others. For all that, he had no sincere friends and the others always criticized his way of acting. For my part, I always maintained a good friendship with him. When he had too much work, he would ask for my help. For example I would, always under his guidance, help him look in the files for the necessary documents in order to make certified copies or to help maintain the daily accounting records, the day cash box, the main cash box, etc.

All of these things were skills that later on served me so well in the various stages of my life. At the same time, I received a little money to strike a blow against our very poor economic situation. Similarly, the students who were graduating with their Bachelors and Masters degrees had to hand-in their own type-written thesis, and, because I had acquired the skill of type-writing in Uncle Fernando’s house during the year I spent in Guatemala City in 1930, some of the graduates asked me to type their thesis. In this manner, I had other small sources of income besides my job.

I will tell you something about some shows that were presented in Guatemala and that also came to Antigua. The ones that caught my attention the most and, of which I have never again seen anything similar, was “The Dog Comedians”. Walking on two legs without the intervention of anyone except the trainer, the dogs presented short theatrical works in which all the actors were dogs of diverse kinds. (The trainer directed the dogs from a distance with signs and words.) The dogs were prettily decorated in accord with the work and the size of the actors (the dogs). Their clothing, whether male or female, was well put together. It was very gratifying and as natural as if the actors were human beings. I don’t know where this theatre troupe came from but it seems to me they came from Europe or South America.

The great Italian impersonator Frégoli was the inspiration for another actor who appeared. He presented theatrical works with all the acting performed by only one actor. The actor would instantly change personalities, entering by one door dressed in men’s clothing and leaving by the other in women’s clothing with the proper wig and other stuff, or in reverse. In abridged stories, only one person played all of the roles of the different parts of the play in a very short time and with an admirable mastery. The performances were inspired by the work of Leopoldo Frégoli, a famous Italian quick-change artist.

#### 1938	

Everything in this world comes to an end. Our precarious economic situation was slowly changing. When Mr. José María Lira was relieved of his job of Administrator of Revenue, the dynamic and charismatic Mr. Carlos Conde was appointed in his place. He quickly gained the affection of a large part of the teachers by redeeming the outdated pay slips with greater frequency. He frequently did favors for me by asking me to bring one of the oldest pay slips to him and then paying it off completely. Later, I learned from a good friend of mine that on a certain occasion he told someone that he had taken a liking to me because one time I had spoken very highly of him.

President Ubico was a very vigorous enemy of bums, thieves and communists during his term in office. Each year, exactly on the 15th of January, he left on schedule to visit all of the twenty-two Departments of the Republic. Beginning in early December, groups of Public Accountants went before him to audit the offices that managed funds belonging to the Government. These groups were given the vulgar name of “The Kites”. They had to give a report of whatever irregularity they found so that, when the President arrived, he already knew the findings of the audit. If they found a shortage, the responsible employee or public official was immediately dismissed from office and jailed.

##### The fair-haired Mendizabal

These visits were normally made in the President’s automobile with a large detachment of motorcycle police heralding his approach so as to open the way for him and his numerous retinues. He enjoyed traveling at dizzying speeds with a driver that had complete control of the steering wheel and was at the same time honorable and worthy of confidence. I don’t remember the driver’s first name. I remember only that he was called “The fair-haired Mendizabal”. He drove so fast he always tailgated the motorist in front of him.

Years later, when the fair-haired Mendizabal retired from service, General Ubico gave him a large sum of money so he could start his own business. He did so, buying several new buses to start a bus line between the Capital and the City of Antigua under the name of, The Beautiful. The buses were very popular because they were safe and punctual. The famous fair-haired Mendizabal settled himself in the City of the Perpetual Roses, Monument of the Americas and Patrimony of Humanity (i.e. Antigua).

Professor Fermín Vielman Muñiz, who occupied the post of First Inspector of the Institute, was appointed the Second Grade teacher. This elevated me to First Inspector. Major Luis Morales Chacón became Second Inspector and Second Lieutenant Héctor Mario Luna was appointed Third Inspector. Colonel Oscar H. Galo continued on as Inspector General and retired Capitan José E. Abril continued to fill the post of Honorary Sub-Director. As you can see, the military command continued to grow, leaving me the only civilian. Our standard uniform consisted of a khaki military jacket, biretta and trousers. For the dress uniform, the Minister of Education (under the leadership of the engineer Luis Schlesinger Carrera) obtained for us cream-colored cloth for the jacket and military hat. The pants were marine-blue in color. We paid for the tailoring.

##### Sacramental Archivist

The new parson, Juan Álvarez Cresco, a Spanish priest of about sixty years of age, arrived at the Cathedral of Antigua. During this time, an old friend of mine, and therefore a friend of my family, the Sacristan Julio Rodriguez M. spoke with my sister Marta and asked if she would undertake the task of maintaining Father Cresco’s clothing. She would do this work in our house. She accepted the job and from this time forward all the family maintained a cordial friendship with the priest. He always treated us with affection and confidence. He assigned the archives of the church to me and I kept the books of the baptisms, confirmations and marriages. I was paid generously for everything.

I visited Father Cresco frequently to talk because he was very lively and learned. He told me about his stay in Paris during his first years as a priest and in Havana where he lived for many years before arriving in Guatemala. He belonged to the Pauline Order and possessed a good library that he donated to the ecclesiastical tribunal of Guatemala.

One time, he was the victim of a serious illness. His primary physician, Doctor Jorge E. Alvarado, diagnosed an incurable disease and gave him a year and a half to live. The priest continued to live normally but he was clearly worried. One day, he invited me to accompany him to Chimaltenango and Parramos where he had two lots, one in each place, that were planted in beans and corn. Months later Julio the Sacristan told me that the priest had called on his lawyer to make his will and had named me as the heir of one of the lots. Days later, the priest gave me a canvas bag containing paper money and some coins. He told me to count the bills and to bundle them into packs of one hundred Quetzals each. The money added up to a little less than Q. 3,000. He opened a desk drawer and took out a bill from his physician, Doctor Alvarado, in the amount of Q. 1,000. The bill read: “For professional visits during the year”. However, the reality was different than this. Certainly, the Doctor had visited the Priest a few times, more as a friend than as a professional. The majority of the times, the Doctor gave absolutely no orders nor examined anyone. The only thing he actually did was to comment on current events.

So, without hiding his anger, the priest took Q. 1,000 of the money that I had counted out and gave it and the bill to me and asked me if I would please carry them to the doctor. He asked me to bring the bill back after it had been signed and stamped as paid. The remainder of the money he returned to the pocket of his jacket where he kept it.

From that time on, the disease became worse. (I suspect that it was cancer.) One day the Metropolitan Archbishop, Monsignor Douro y Soure, came to visit. The purpose of the visit was to force the priest to sign a will giving all of his property to the Holy Family Asylum in Antigua Guatemala. This had the consequence of annulling his previous will and I…was back on the streets again, as I had always been, and now without the hope of owning a little land in Chimaltenango.

Time continued its inexorable march. The Priest’s health declined each day. He rented a house inside of the ruins of Saint Joseph the Elder. I never ceased to visit him during his last days in that house and, the nights when I was not working, I spent in his presence. Finally, he quietly died. I helped at the funeral and passed the night sleeping in the house with no more company than the spirit of the Priest Juan Álvares Crespo, R.S.V.P.

##### The German family of Enrique Boppel

It was during the 1930s that I spent some time getting to know my mother’s nieces twice removed. They were the married children of Francisca Rosa de Boppel, my mother’s cousin. She was married to a German named Enrique Boppel who was the owner of four coffee farms a few kilometers from Mazatenango. They had five children: Enrique, Elsa Carlota, Olga Margarita, Blanca Elvira and Yolanda. The family lived in Germany but frequently visited Guatemala. On many occasions, I visited with them in their house on 8th Avenue South in Zone 1 in Guatemala City. 

One time, they told me that they wanted to buy a marimba to carry back to Germany. While searching through the want ads in the newspaper, I found an ad offering a marimba for sale. I quickly communicated this to my aunt Paca and, What Luck! the price was low and she bought it. Later I learned that the mother and the three oldest daughters formed a family band. This caused some excitement in their circle of friends who spent a lot of time listening to them at their house when the family was in Germany.

In Germany, they had nine houses. They traveled frequently while on vacation, spending some weeks in the Capital of Guatemala and others at the San Isidro farm. San Isidro was the largest of their properties. Just before the Second World War began, the elder Enrique died in Guatemala and was buried on the farm at San Isidro. This left Enrique Junior to run the four farms while Mrs. Francisca, now the only owner, returned with her daughters to Germany.

Once the war started, after lengthy interrogations and proving that they had no connection with the Jews, Mrs. Francisca managed to return to Guatemala with her daughter Yolanda. The other children were married and they remained with their husbands in Germany for several years. The only daughter who never left Germany was Elsa Carlota. The explosion of a bomb dropped on their house by the British Air Force while they were bombing the city killed her.

Another cousin of my mother, Adriana Rosa de Valenzuela, married the Honduran physician Calixto Valenzuela and had three daughters: María Teresa, Haydée and Adrianita. The doctor lived in Honduras and only rarely came to Guatemala. Adriana lived a sedentary life and only rarely left the house. She spent most of her time curled-up in bed smoking cigarettes. When she finished one cigarette, she used the butt to light the next.

Another cousin, Isidora Rosa de Soto, called Chichi by her friends and family, married Mr. Max Soto who was the owner of a large number of houses in Guatemala. He had, as a result, a large income from the renters. 

##### We could only endure so much

One time, when I was out-of-work, Chichi proposed to my mother that we move to the Capital City to watch over the masons and carpenters who were building a number of apartments on a lot situated on 12th Avenue North at the foot of Mount Carmen. During the construction, there was a large quantity of building materials that could have been easily stolen if there was no one to guard it. For this reason, she offered us a newly constructed apartment where we could live without having to pay rent in exchange for watching the premises. Since we were in the Capital City, my sister Marta and I thought that we could probably find some work. Marta had her little son, Mario, of more or less two years of age whose father, Aurelio Díaz, had only recently died.

Given the strength of our needs, we accepted the offer and moved to the Capital City with the hopes of finding a better life. We moved into our new home. Beginning at Calvary, we walked up and down looking for work but found nothing. Little by little, we were using up our scarce resources. Once in a while, I was able to repair an iron or another electrical appliance because when I worked as the store clerk for the Electric Company of Antigua, I had learned a few things. Marta, on her part, very rarely had any income and we ended up eating only beans and rice with tortillas and coffee without bread. The few times we managed to buy a little bread, we rejoiced. I am not exaggerating when I say that from that time I know what it is like to be hungry and not have the means to end it. Some times we tasted nothing, not even a mouthful, all day.

It is said that God will squeeze you but not hang you. In an apartment on the other side from where we lived was a poor but hardworking family. The husband and wife left early and came home late in the day. We made friends with them and they frequently gave us food and told us where we might find work.

Finally, Marta was given a position in the La India shirt factory, the property of Mr. José Tabush, which was situated in a place called the Portal del Comercio. Her job was to sew parts of shirts. I say parts because there were other people who worked only on the collars, the most delicate part. Others worked on the cuffs and so on until the shirts came to those who put the pieces together, ending up as flamboyant shirts.

The director was a Spanish woman who had worked as a specialist in the United States in one of the Arrow Shirt factories. She was very demanding but Marta had no problem with her because she was skilled in the work. The only bad thing was that the salary was low considering the delicacy of the work. However, at least now there was something to fill the stomach.

We could only endure so much. After the apartments were finished, Mother had to sell a chest of drawers made of passionflower wood to pay a small truck to carry our things back to Antigua. We arrived there with downcast faces. After the good-byes were said, we never heard from the Soto-Rosa family again.

Another cousin of my mother from the same family was Blanca Rosa de Estrada. She was the youngest and the poorest of the four sisters. She married Manuel Estrada de la Hoz and had three sons: Manolo, Estela and Guillermo. Estelita married Rogelio Solórzano, a senior employee at the Electric Company. Guillermo spent some time in Chile and was a close friend of Dr. Juan José Arévalo, who at one time was the President of Guatemala. When Arévalo returned to Chile, Guillermo de la Hoz was instrumental in the formation of the Corps of Volunteer Firefighters of Guatemala.

#### 1939

On the first of September the Second World War began with the invasion of Poland by German troops under the Nazi government of the dictator Adolfo Hitler. The war lasted six years with the Germans surrendering on May 8, 1945 and the Japanese on August 15 of the same year.

In January 1939 work was begun on the National Palace, the pride of Guatemala, the details of which I will mention further along when we arrive at the date of its inauguration in 1943.

The debt that was owed to the teachers and administrative personnel of the institutes and schools of Guatemala was finally totally paid. The debt consisted of the unpaid salaries of those who served in the Public Education Branch of the Republic. Those who benefited most were those instructors who had other income from their professional activities, such as lawyers, doctors, chemists and businessmen. They did not have to sell their script to the unscrupulous merchants like the majority of us who had no other income apart from our salary. From this date forward, the salaries were never paid late.       

### The Fourth Decade: Peña Plata and El Zambo

#### 1940

Our dear director and my friend Mr. Abraham Orantes was removed from his position and replaced by Professor Florencio Galvez, an honest and well-intended man. Most importantly, Professor Galvez was experienced, having previously been in charge of several institutes in different Departments of the Republic and in Guatemala City.

During this time, I walked around with my shirttails hanging out thinking that at the moment when I least expected it, they would pull the rug out from under me in order to put a military officer in my position. Except for me, all of the Inspectors were military officers including the Sub-Director Captain Jose E. Abril, the Inspector General Coronel Oscar H. Galo, the Second Inspector Major Luis Morales Chacon and the Third Inspector Second Lieutenant Hector Mario Luna. However, I had the good fortune that Professor Eduardo Martínez Balcells, an old friend and companion from normal school days, was named Vice-Minister of Education. On an official visit that he made to the Institute, he greeted me warmly and told me in private that, “As long as it is possible for me to help you, you can count on me.”

#### 1941

On the First of March, my aunt Mrs. Matilde Castillo Orantes Morales, the wife of my deceased uncle Fernando, died in the Capital of Guatemala. I did not attend the funeral because I did not learn of her death in time to make the necessary arrangements. 

On Sunday December 7 the Japanese launched a surprise attack with their air forces against the naval fleet of the North Americans that was anchored in Pearl Harbor Bay in the Pacific Ocean. The Americans could not defend themselves because most of the sailors and marines were away from their ships enjoying the holiday. The attack damaged or sunk a good number of ships of the US Pacific fleet. After this attack, the United States decided to enter the Second World War on the Allied side.

#### 1942

On Sunday the 10th of April, after having been engaged to be married for seven years, my bachelorhood finally came to an end. My fiancé Elisa Francisca Bocaletti Gramegno and I united our destinies by the bonds of marriage. She was born at Number 15, 6th Street East in Antigua Guatemala (only four houses from where my mother and uncle Fernando were born) on Holy Friday, April 2, 1915 the daughter of Mr. Efre Bocaletti, a certified mechanic, originally from Mantua, Italy, and Mrs. Angelina Gramegno also originally from Mantua or Verona, Italy. (Mr. Efre died tragically on July 31, 1923).

The civil ceremony took place in the Municipal Court in the Palace of the Town Hall and the religious ceremony took place in the Cathedral, both on the same day. Our sponsors for both ceremonies were Guillermo Arzú Matheu and his wife Marina Orantes Alfaro. Pastor Gabriel Solares performed the religious ceremony. The decorations for the church and the High Altar were a gift from my ancient friend Julio Rodriguez, the church’s sacristan. The orchestra consisted of seven young men who were my friends and who also donated their time. The cards and invitations I personally made in the Pablo R. Torres Print Shop. I was given the cardstock at no cost whatsoever. For my suit of black English cassimere, I only paid for the tailoring because my friends Julio Guerra, Oscar Estrada and Ofelio Terreaux gave me the cloth. For the rings, I only paid for the gold because my friend and companion Salvador Segura, the jeweler, made them without cost. My sister Marta sewed the wedding gown and my wife’s brother-in-law Alberto Solórzano N. and his wife María Teresa Boccaletti Gramegno paid for the champagne for the toast. In short, the wedding could not have been done at less cost. What do you think?

My apprenticeship began sooner than I expected. It happened that only two months after the wedding, the Minister of Education notified me that, by order of the President, every one of the Institute Inspectors had to have a military commission. Consequently, they thanked me for having lent them my services for nine years and named an Army Captain in my place. And now what was I to do? Well, someone who could sympathize and console came to my rescue: my cousins in Guatemala City. I went to see them, as I did frequently, and explained to them my situation. Quickly Maltildita said to me: “Look Daniel, something has occurred to me, if you want let’s go visit Francisco Figueroa Godoy.” Francisco Figueroa G. was her friend and, at that time, he occupied the post of Director General of Supervised Farms. When Guatemala declared war on Germany, the Government assumed control of certain properties belonging to German nationals. The Government appointed agents to supervise the properties and Mr. Godoy headed the agency in charge of the confiscated farm property.    

##### “You don’t look like an administrator”

We reached an agreement, and without thinking twice about it, went to see her friend Paco the next day. We explained that we were cousins and then asked him to give me the job of managing a farm. He studied me from head to toe, smiled and said, in a very friendly manner, “You don’t look like an administrator but I will nominate you to be the Overseer of one of the six farms where we have vacancies.” He mentioned the names of the farms and their locations. “Which one did I want?” After thinking about it for a short time, I replied: “I would prefer the Peña Plata farm because it is in the Municipality of Yepocapa in the Department of Chimaltenango and a short distance from Antigua in comparison to the other farms you mentioned.” “Very well,” he said,” it is arranged. Present yourself the day after tomorrow to my office to pick up your credentials and your instructions.”

We thanked him and left. On the third day, we returned, he gave me my credentials, which were already prepared, and told me: “On the First of September you will meet with Mr. Arturo García, the Inspector General of Supervised Farms, at the Central Railroad Station in time to leave on the 8AM train and he will give you possession of your post.”

After making all of the preparations for the trip, my wife Elisa and I agreed that I would leave by myself and she would stay temporarily with my mother and sister in Antigua. The reason for this was that the farm was an unknown world for us. Elisa was pregnant and it seemed prudent that I go ahead to explore the lay of the land.

Thus it was that on the first of September, before eight o’clock in the morning, I positioned myself at the main entrance of the Railroad Station in Guatemala City. A little later, Mr. García arrived. He quickly recognized me because I had previously described what I would be wearing: kaki trousers and shirt, leggings, a brown-colored felt hat and carrying a portfolio. I approached him and asked if he was the person for whom I was waiting. He answered in the affirmative. After introducing ourselves, we went to the ticket window. He purchased two tickets to the Coconut Plantation (Cocales) Rail Station (between Escuintla and Rio Bravo on the Pacific Railroad) and paid for them.

##### Young man, take this stick

We boarded the first class cabin and, promptly at eight o’clock, the train started on its way, arriving at the station at the coconut plantation between one and two o’clock in the afternoon. There an employee of the farm was waiting for us with two mounts, one a hinny and the other a mule. Mr. Garcia mounted the mule and left the hinny to me. He was given a pair of spurs. I was given nothing.

We mounted and undertook the march north away from the coastal plain and into the mountains where the farm was located. The mule that Mr. Garcia rode was faster than my hinny so that I was soon left behind. Finally, Mr. Garcia gave me one of his spurs and we arrived dead tired at the town of Patulul in the foothills of the Sierra Madre mountain range.

We still had two hours of travel to arrive at our final destination but, due to my own fault and lack of experience, upon arriving at a corner in the downtown area of Patulul, my famous hinny came to a dead stop. No matter how many times I stuck him with the spur, he refused to step either forward or backward. At that moment, two smiling young women of 16 to 18 years of age came out of a neighboring house. One of them was carrying a long stick. She said: “Young man, take this stick so you can strike your beast to see if he will walk.” I thanked them and took the stick but I felt embarrassed. With the passing of time, I befriended them and their family. They were the daughters of the newspaperman Rufino Guerra Cortave. 

From there on, with the help of the spur and the stick, I could continue the march at my companion’s side. Together we traveled east into the mountains east of Patulul up a lonely horse trail, sometimes in the mountains and sometimes in the coffee plantations of the farms El Faro, Santa Elisa and Santa Elena Sinaca. I felt a lump in my throat and a great sadness to see how far I was from civilization. Finally, we arrived at Peña Plata. The General Manager Mister José Oseas Rodas came out to meet us. He was a very friendly person of between 38 to 40 years of age. It was about five-thirty in the evening. He wanted to turn the job of Overseer over to me the following day.

##### The ground shook continuously

I spent the night more awake than asleep, my head in another world. I could only imagine what I had gotten myself into. The next day, they took me to inventory all the tools and chattels of the farm. The same with the cattle, horses and mules for riding and hauling, books and vouchers of the moneybox with the cash money already audited. In this way, all of the farm and its pertinences became my responsibility. For the first month, I lived alone in a two-story wooden house. The second floor or the living area was divided into two parts. The manager and his family occupied one half and I was assigned the other. On the ground floor were the offices and a storeroom for tools.

The ground shook continuously. Less than a month before, to be precise on the 6th of August, the earthquake of Yepocapa struck the neighboring area. The hamlet of San Pedro Yepocapa was left virtually in ruins and the entire region suffered considerable damage. In Santa Rosa Sumatán and a neighboring farm alone there were fifty deaths, twenty-five in each place, because the ranches were located at the foot of a mountain. The hill was broken apart by the earthquake and the resulting landslide buried the worker’s houses. A nearby road was made impassable by a very deep crevice that was more or less 75 centimeters (two feet) wide. The crevice was so deep that it was impossible to see its bottom. The aftershocks continued for several months but with decreasing intensity. 

With my wife Licha’s agreement, we decided that she would move to the farm in the middle of October. I should say that Peña Plata was the most remote farm in the entire region. It is located only six miles east of Patulul as the crow flies but at an altitude of 2155 feet above sea level and surrounded on three sides by towering mountains. It is accessible only by foot or horseback. Cars could not get there because there was no road over the rugged terrain. The headquarters and drying floors of the farm were located in the bottom of a narrow valley surrounded by hills some hundreds of meters high. I’m not lying when I say that if one stood in the middle of the drying floors, which are located in front of the offices, you could see a narrow strip of sky, surrounded by mountains partly planted in coffee.

The friendship between Mr. José (Chepe) Rodas, the manager of the farm, and I grew as the days passed without incident although we always kept a certain distance between us. One day, when we were both confident of our friendship, he confessed to me that the mount that was sent to bring me from the railroad station at Cocales, the day when I first arrived at the farm, was named the Tamarind. He was the most stubborn of all of the animals on the farm. He was usually used as a pack animal but, when an unwelcome guest came to visit, the Tamarind was chosen as his mount. Since the hinny would not obey anyone, even an experienced rider, what do you think would happen to a novice like me? No wonder I looked ridiculous!

I had spent all of my life in the city but in a short time I learned the art of mounting and riding a horse as God intended. Otherwise, I would have had to stay shut-up in the house because there was no other means of transport. The closest a car could get was the farm of Santa Rosa Sumatán, the property of Mr. Carlos Mirón. His farm was some four kilometers away and reached only by footpaths through the coffee trees. The trails became quagmires during the rainy season. God help me, I could tell you about them!

##### A month and a half was eternity

After a month and a half that seemed an eternity to me, the moment arrived to go to Antigua and bring Licha to the farm. This time we did not travel by train, rather we traveled in a truck, coming by the highway through Esquintla. Upon arriving at the Santa Rosa ranch, we found an employee of Peña Plata waiting for us with two horses. One of them was very gentle. This one was for Licha, who on this occasion made her debut in this mode of locomotion. With my help, she mounted the animal and we rode off through the jungle.

We arrived at the farm without incident, a little tired but happy to be together again. The farm lacked even the most rudimentary conveniences. Electric lights were turned on only at night and there was no refrigerator, mixer or gas stove. The kitchen had a wood-burning stove. We could not use electric appliances because the electricity was direct current, not alternating current like in all of the cities. 

A commissionaire left the farm for Patulul with the mail every day sharply at six in the morning. He returned with the mail and the supplies-groceries-at around four in the afternoon when he was sober. When he was drunk, he arrived at eight or nine o’clock in the night. When he arrived, we had to boil the meat right away so it would not spoil overnight because we had no means of refrigeration.

#### 1943

The Department of Supervised Farms regularly sent me checks. We cashed them at the grocery stores of Juan Gomar or Francisco León at a 5% discount because there was no office of the Bank of Guatemala in Patulul. Other times we cashed them in Yepocapa in the store belonging to the Spaniard Enrique Escobio with the same 5% discount.

We made the trip to town on horseback with only a Colt .38 revolver for company. I bought the gun just in case although, in those days, the lonely roads were very safe. Assault, robberies or kidnappings were unheard off because of the hard hand of President Ubico. He was a forceful enemy of vagabonds and thieves. Nowadays many, many people, including me, are homesick for those days.

At the beginning of the year, I received a letter from the Department of Supervised Farms ordering that, beginning on that date, I had to cash all of the checks coming from that office at the nearest office of the Bank of Guatemala. This notice fell on me like rain from Heaven because the closest office was in Antigua. For this reason, I frequently traveled by highway to the land of my birth with all expenses paid including bus tickets, food and board.

On March 24, our first daughter, Marta Elena, was born in Antigua. We brought her to the farm a month later. She was very pretty and in good health. Unfortunately, at three months of age, she became sick to her stomach. In that lonely place and, without a doctor nearby, we opted to take her to Antigua. We put her in the hands of Doctor Carlos Catalán Prem who diagnosed an intestinal infection. I returned to the farm leaving Licha with the child. The baby did not get better. On the contrary, every day she was worse until on June 18 at two o’clock in the afternoon, I received a telegram from Licha advising me that Marta Elena had died.

Immediately, I told the manager. He, in his turn, ordered a young man, Manuel Alesio, the farm’s cowboy, to accompany me. At four o’clock in the afternoon, we began the journey on horseback and arrived at Antigua at six o’clock in the morning after traveling all night. We had covered a distance of 75 kilometers. We arrived to find that the baby had been buried the evening before. At six o’clock in the morning of the following day, we left on the return journey arriving at the farm at nine o’clock in the night, very tired and with heavy hearts.

##### The National Palace

On November 10, 1943 the birthday of General Jorge Ubico Castañedas, then the President of Guatemala, the National Palace was inaugurated. It was the largest and most majestic work of his administration. The final cost was two million, eight hundred thousand Quetzals. Guatemalans did all of the construction. The engineer Rafael Pérez de León drew the plans from sketches supplied by General Ubico who then approved the plans after studying them. The direction and execution of the plans was in the hands of the engineers Rafael Pérez de León, Enrique Riera and Luis Angel Rodas. The engineer Arturo A. Bickford and his assistants Mr. Luis N. Ponce and Roco Valerio were in charge of the work. Mr. Victor Muralles was head of the crew leaders and construction workers.

The Guatemalan sculptor Rodolfo Galeotti Torres was in charge of the decorations carved in white stone from Totonicapan. Carlos Rigalt Anguiano was the force behind the pictorial elements, giving them quality and beauty, especially the murals, roofs and carved panels on the ceilings. Nicolás Esposito, Roberto Gonzáles Goyri, Guillermo Grajeda Mena and Dagoberto Vásquez  participated equally. The artist Alfredo Gálvez Suárez from Coban painted the murals at the entrance of the National Palace. The stained-glass maker Julio Urruela Vásquez formed the sixteen beautiful stained-glass windows that show various aspects of the Guatemalan life and are located in the Banquet Room and the central hallway.

The Municipality of Guatemala contracted a huge quantity of wood used in the construction of the doors and windows of the Palace. Mr. Juan Mini contracted to make the seven hundred and eighteen doors and three hundred and eight-six windows, all of mahogany and with finishes chosen by those directing the work. This quantity of doors and windows had a cost of one hundred and thirty-two thousand, two hundred and five Quetzals but this figure does not cover the value of the hinges, glass and paint. In this way, the National Palace had at its moment of inauguration 145 doors and 78 windows on the first floor, 192 doors and 90 windows on the second floor, 276 doors and 120 windows on the third floor, 40 doors and 98 windows on the terrace and 75 cedar doors in the basement.

The Executive branch of Government was in charge of the inauguration of this imposing work. The official speech was delivered by the Learned Guillermo Sáenz de Tjada, Minister of Internal Affairs and Justice. He was assisted by, among others, the Learned Lius F. Mendizabal, the President of the Legislative establishment; the learned Rafael Ordoñez Solis, President of the Judicial establishment; the Learned Ernesto Rivas, Secretary to the President of the Republic and various Secretaries and Ministers of State.

The National Palace is rectangular in form and measures from east to west (the front) 127 meters long and from north to south (the sides) 70 meters. The total area is 8,890 square meters. The entry hall is two-stories high. An enormous electric light hangs from a pretty dome. As everyone knows, during the administration of Ubico, sound equipment was not common and not as widespread as nowadays. If the TGW radio station in Guatemala City even existed, remote controls certainly did not and there were very few microphones or loudspeakers. To overcome this deficiency, when General Ubico began the construction of this room he asked that they give it good acoustics so that voices could be heard across the room without having to speak loudly.

#### 1944

The mutual affection and the bonds of friendship that united me with the manager of Peña Plata continued to grow. One day, he said to me: “I have noted that you enjoy being outside. If you are in agreement, beginning tomorrow, I will leave the work of cultivation and organization of the workers and the crew leaders to you. Consult me in cases where you are doubtful. When you leave this farm, I would like for you to be capable of discharging the job of manager wherever you find yourself.” For this reason, I always remember with gratitude and affection my good friend José Oseas Rodas. The good training I received from him was the foundation from which I later advanced to other administrative jobs in the coffee-growing field in Guatemala as well as in Mexico.

To entertain ourselves on Sundays, we often went hunting in the mountains where deer, pizotes, wild boar, etc. were found in abundance. In this manner, I learned to shot firearms, shotguns, rifles and pistols and I was not that bad at it. Every once in a while we visited our friends Carlos Mirón, Mauricio del Pinal and Alfonso Arroyave who were owners of Santa Rosa Sumatán farm, San Rafael Sumatán farm and Blue Mountain farm respectively.

This same year, toward the end of June, President Ubico was presented with a letter signed by approximately one hundred prominent persons in which they said that, because of the generalized discontent in the country caused by his dictatorial government, the most prudent thing to do was for him to renounce his position.

##### He presented his resignation

The Executive called the most important signatories of the document, who were also his friends, and asked them if the signatures were authentic. They replied that they were. They made him see that they had taken this step because the current situation was very grave and, to prevent any useless spilling of blood, the best solution was for him to hand over power peacefully. After 14 years as President of the country, he presented his resignation, handing the power to the First Designate General Federico Ponce Vaides on July 19. General Federico Ponce Vaides stayed as President only 108 days before being overthrown on October 20 by a revolution headed by Major Francisco Javier Arana, Capitan Jacobo Arbenz Guzmán and the civilian Jorge Toriello Garrido. These men formed the triumvirate that assumed the Executive Power of the Nation. In December, Presidential elections were held. The Doctor of Philosophy Juan José Arévalo Bermejo emerged triumphant with an immense majority of the votes. He took possession of the Presidency on March 15, 1945.

During the Administration of Doctor Arévalo, there was a great change in Guatemala that benefited the public in general. He implemented the Labor Code and the Social Security Institute of Guatemala. He placed great emphasis on education and built consolidated schools in all of the neighborhoods of the Capital City and elsewhere.

On December 8, our son Daniel Enrique was born at the Peña Plata farm. He was baptized at the Cathedral in Antigua. His godmother was Mrs. Victoria Cofiño de Godoy, the wife of Julio Godoy and sister of Pedro G. Cofiño.

#### 1945

In early January, the widow Mrs. Francisca R. de Boppel (my mother’s cousin) spoke with my mother and told her that one of her four farms needed a General Manager. In 1921, her husband had purchased six farms from a partnership based in Hamburg, Germany. In 1945, his widow still owned four farms in the area northeast of Mazatenango (Las Nubes, San Isidro, El Zambo and Altamira). She thought about offering the job to me at a salary of seventy-five Quetzals monthly. I had been employed for over two years as the Supervisor of Peña Plata farm and was earning fifty Quetzals a month. Once I learned of the offer that Mrs. Francisca had made, I did not think twice about it. I accepted the offer and handed in my resignation at Peña Plata.

In early March, I took possession of the administration of the El Zambo farm. El Zambo was an earthly paradise compared to the previous farm. It was completely planted in coffee and was adjacent to the hamlet of San Francisco Zapotitlán. The old highway leading to the city of Quetzaltenanago, some 50 kilometers away, and to Mazatenango, only 20 kilometers away, cut through the farm. That is to say, it was in a favorable location. Also, unlike Peña Plata that is located in the mountains, El Zambo is located on some low hills in a broad valley and is surrounded by coffee and banana plantations. Only a little run-down from the previous administrations, it had produced 5,000 quintals (sacks) of 100 pounds each of mature coffee the year before.

##### Historical Facts
	
On August 15, Japan surrendered unconditionally and ended the Second World War. To arrive at that object was the point of detonating the only two atomic bombs ever dropped on civilian targets. The North American army dropped the bombs on two different Japanese cities within days of each other. The first was dropped on August 6 at 8:30 in the morning on the city of Hiroshima with a result of 60,000 died and 100,000 wounded. The second was dropped on August 9 on Nagasaki where 80,000 persons died and a third of the city demolished.

In April and June, the Charter of the United Nations to preserve World Peace was signed. The UN was founded in October 24 with its headquarters in New York City.

#### 1946

On the 6th of June, our daughter Rosa María was born on the El Zambo farm. She was baptized in the church of San Bartolo in Mazatenango. Her godparents were Coronel Oscar H. Galo and his wife Clara Laines de Galo. Coronel Galo was a musician in Antigua. His wife was also the godmother of our youngest son. 

A large group of coffee farms in the area of Mazatenango, San Francisco Zapotitlán and surrounding municipalities signed contracts with a company named Tiquisate Agricultural Company (Agrícola Tiquisate, a subsidiary of the United Fruit Company) to plant bananas that could serve as shade for the coffee trees. For this purpose, they had a network of piping of various diameters that extended to all of the areas planted in bananas for the purpose of fumigation of the bananas. The powerful pumps and tanks where the mixtures of fungicides and fertilizers were prepared were installed on the San Carlos Farm, the property of my good friends Feliciano de Leon and his son Hector of the same last name. All of the parts, materials and labor for the installations were made at the expense of the Tiquisate Agricultural Company. The planting and care of the bananas was done at the expense of the farms but under the supervision of the technicians of the company. Most of the company men were from the Caribbean except for the superintendents, who were Guatemalan agricultural technicians, and the top bosses, who were North American.

The Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) came into being. Before the Second World War, the United States of America had no official intelligence establishment but in 1940 President Franklin Delano Roosevelt authorized the creation of the Office of Strategic Services (OSE). This was dismantled at the end of the war but many of its members stayed in government service and formed the nucleus of the CIA when President Harry S. Truman founded the CIA in 1947.

#### 1947

The crop continued to grow. The 1st of September, our daughter Elisa Angelina was born at the El Zambo farm. She was baptized in the Church of San Francisco Zapotitlán. Her godmother was Mrs. Argentina Fanjul de Bonifasi, the wife of Mr. Antonio Bonifasi, who owned the neighboring “Las Margaritas” farm.

The banana plantations on the El Zambo farm began to produce fruit of magnificent quality. We harvested 55,000 to 60,000 bunches annually. This was the most production of the four farms belonging to the Boppel family. The bananas produced at El Zambo won First Place in the exposition held during the carnival at Mazatenango.

Once a week bunches for export were cut and carefully wrapped in special boxes and plastic bags. They were transported in trucks belonging to the farm and others belonging to the truckers Cesareo Soto and Julio Morales Ricci. The point of embarkation were the railroad stations at Mazatenango and San Antonio Suchitepéquez for the boxes sent to the Atlantic ports and the Port of Champerico for the boxes that were to be shipped to the Pacific side. I know that the railroad track that existed in San Antonio was taken up almost forty years ago because it became unprofitable.

In accord with the requirements of the recently implemented Labor Code, agricultural workers were granted five days of paid vacation for every year of service. Administrators of farms were classified as Management but, according to the criteria of the owners of the farms, we were Agricultural Workers and we were given five days of vacation annually. We invariable received them on Wednesday, Holy Thursday and Good Friday, Saturday and Easter Sunday. We had to be at work again on Easter Monday, supposedly well rested, so we could continue our work.

This system prevailed during the years that I worked at El Zambo. To guard the health of the workers, Doctor Moisés Flores Barrios was contracted to visit once a week, usually on Wednesdays. He went around to every worker’s living quarters and asked a routine question: “Is anyone sick?” The head of the house came out or the family members answered “Yes” or “No” depending on the situation. Those that suffered any breakdown in their health showed the doctor their symptoms. The physician immediately began his examination, diagnosed the illness and handed out a prescription.

I usually accompanied the doctor who, in turn, explained to me the symptoms of the disease and the medicine that was suitable for the suffering. In this way, I obtained a good understanding of the medicine for the diseases of the region. Sometimes, he gave me the instruments so I could make the examination and the diagnosis. He would either give his approval or correct my error with an explanation. On the farm, there was a medicine chest stocked with the more common medicines. In special cases, we sent the prescription to the New Pharmacy in Mazatenango for it to be filled. Under those circumstances, I also was the nurse and I learned to inject medicines and effect cures.

#### 1948

The era of television began, beginning with the production of televisions in the United States. It extended to Europe in the beginning of the 1950s.

On the 14th of August, our son Oscar Rodolfo was born on the El Zambo farm. He was baptized in the Church of San Bartolo in Mazatenango. The godmother was Clara Laines de Galo.

When I arrived at the farm in the year of 1945, I brought a cow that I had purchased in Peña Plata for the sum of Q.15.00 along with her baby – a little calf. The cow was a Brown Swiss and gave ten liters of milk daily. She was virile - just like her owners. That is to say: she dropped a calf every year. As a result, we had an abundance of milk for family consumption. We learned how to make cheese and sold the leftovers.

In the yard of the farm, in front of the owner’s residence was a regular-sized swimming pool with its own diving board and crystal-clear water. On Sundays, our friends from Mazatenango came to visit, bring stores of food and a bottle of Cognac or Whiskey. We would swim and pass the better part of the day happily chatting. The families that came regularly were those of Doctor Moisés Flores Barrios (the physician for the farms, the railroad and Social Security), Mr. Marcos Cohen (the owner of the clothing and textile store called The Little Princess) and Mr. Luis Guerra Espel (the owner of a hardware store and gas station located on the corner of Central Avenue opposite the park). We also exchanged invitations for lunch or supper with the families of Mr. Carlos W. Lehnhoff (who owned the nearby Aquacate farm) and the Doctor Ańgel Coronado Boy.

#### 1949	

On the 10th of August we closed, with a hasp of gold, the production of children with Haydée who was our last product. She was born on the El Zambo farm and baptized in the church of San Antonio Suchitepéquez. The godmother was my sister Marta Julia Morales.

The coffee trees, mostly very old and producing poorly, were gradually replanted with new varieties and more modern systems of cultivation. Similarly, we began to renovate the dwelling units of the workers, leaving them more comfortable and with better sanitary conditions. In addition to the coffee and banana plantations, there was a bee-yard with 250 hives, producing honey and wax that was exported to Germany.

### The Fifth Decade: El Zambo and Las Elviras

#### 1950

When Mother was found in declining health, the doctors of Antigua advised her to go to Guatemala City for an examination by Doctor Bernardo del Valle, a cancer specialist with a good reputation. After seeing the laboratory results, he diagnosed a malignant cancer of the vagina. She had to have surgery without delay at a cost of Q.200.00.

She stayed in the house of my cousin Josefina de Molina who behaved admirably by giving my mother lodging during her stay in the Capital. My mother had no funds to pay for the operation. Without being asked, Josefina told her not to worry because she would loan her the money and afterward my mother could pay her back whenever she could. The surgery was performed quickly and she recuperated without further problems. When I was told what happened, I assumed responsibility for the debt to Josefina and sent her ten monthly payments of twenty Quetzals each.

#### 1951

In January, we traveled to Antigua with the intention of placing our two older children, Daniel and Rosa María, in the Mercy and Asylum of the Holy Family schools respectively. They lodged in a large house with my Mother and my sister Marta. The rented house belonged to the Boppel family. Everything went well all year and Rosa María, who was barely five years old, made her First Communion at the Asylum school. When the school year ended, the two children came back to the farm.

Since Dr. Juan José Arévalo Bermejo had finished his presidential term, elections were held. The official candidate, Coronel Jacobo Arbenz Guzmán, received the largest of votes and assumed power on the 15th of March 1951.

Because it was easy to reach the El Zambo farm with easy access from both the highway and the railroad, friends and relatives frequently visited us. Mother, Marta and Marta’s sons Mario and Miguel Ańgel frequently came to visit. One time, my cousin Matilde Mollinedo Castillo came accompanied by her husband Mr. Bish. On different occasions, my mother-in-law, Angelina Gramegno, the widow of Efre Bocaletti, came to visit accompanied by her children Efre, Carlos, Clara, Enrique Angelina and María Luisa.

My brother-in-law, Carlos Atilio Bocaletti Gramegno, was married to Laura Montúfar but only in a civil ceremony. On one visit that they made to the farm, I asked them why they did not have a church wedding. They replied that they didn’t have time to fill out the forms and the other things. (I believe that the real reason was neglect.) I proposed to them that, if they were in agreement, I would fill out the forms for a religious ceremony at the farm. They agreed and I began to pull strings to get the parish priest to offer a Mass in the wide gallery of the drying floors because there was no church building on the farm. That is what happened. The priest came, offered the Mass and celebrated the marriage ceremony on the drying floors. It was quite an event because the workers on the farm had never before had the opportunity to attend a religious ceremony because there was no church building. As the saying goes, if you really want to do something, anything is possible.

On December 31, the Organization of American States (OAS) with headquarters in Washington, D.C., was founded. The OAS seeks the cooperation and defense of its member states that are some 30 countries in the Americas, including Guatemala.

#### 1952

Every year, a national coffee contest was held in Guatemala City. The most important farms involved in the production of the golden grain sent samples of their coffee to the Capital to be judged. The four farms belonging to the Boppel family always sent products and reports of yields. This year, and for the first time in its history, the farm El Zambo won two silver medals, one for quality of product and the other for yield. The Minister of Agriculture sent two show cards to the management of the farm in my care with news about the two prizes and fixing a date and time when we could pick up the prizes at the office where the ceremony was to take place. When I gave the show cards to Mr. Enrique Boppel Junior, who was the family’s representative, he congratulated me. He said to me: “Keep these cards for your self so they can be used as proof.” The day before the date of the award ceremony, he appointed an employee of a lower category, a supervisor from the San Isidro farm with the last name of Kammer, to go to the Capital and to receive the medals. I can’t remember the man’s first name but I can’t forget that he was a German with blue eyes. Of course, he made the trip with all his expenses paid. Upon his return, the medals were hung in a frame in the office of the San Isidro farm, which was the property of Mr. Enrique Boppel Junior. For El Zambo, nothing!

In the highland areas, all of the coffee plantations had been replanted with new varieties that were more productive than the traditional varieties. At the same time, new methods of planting were used to double the number of plants in the same acreage. Also all of the worker’s living quarters were changed to others that were more modern and comfortable. A new facility (“beneficio” in Spanish) for husking and fermenting the coffee was constructed. However, the improvement that was most advantageous of all was a new system to bring water to the coffee husking mill, the electrical generator, domestic water system, etc. 

The traditional source of water was the neighboring “Las Margaritas” farm that was the property of Mr. Antonio Bonifasi. The water arrived at its destination in an open ditch but the quantity of water was not sufficient for the needs of the facility especially during the summer when the demand for electricity was greatest. The Chitó River and the Black River (Rio Negro) formed the east and west borders respectively of El Zambo. These rivers served to divide El Zambo from the Los Angeles Farm of Mr. Enrique Hoffens and the San Buenaventura Farm of Mr. Eulogio Leppe. 

Many years before, I had found, by careful measuring, that the water of the Chitó River, at its highest point on the farm property, was several meters higher than the coffee facility. To use the water, it would have to be taken from the highest point of its passage through the farm. I mentioned this idea to Mr. Santiago López, Enrique Boppel’s brother-in-law, but he responded, “What makes you think that? Can’t you see that the elevation of the river as it passes through the farm property is lower than that?” Mr. López was the husband of Olga Boppel, one of the daughters of Mrs. Francisca de Boppel. Mr. López and his wife apparently inherited the property after Mrs. Francisca’s death in 1953. They lived at times in the house on El Zambo farm that was the residence of the farm’s owners. 

Nevertheless, several months later, when the German engineer Carlos Marckwardt was directing the renovation of the coffee facility, Enrique Boppel ordered him to survey the river’s level with the result that it was found that there was sufficient height to use the water as I had suggested. For that reason, a holding tank and a new watercourse with a half-inch per yard drop were built. In this way, my dreams were realized and, to the joy of all the workers, a larger generator was installed with enough electrical capacity to light the houses of the workers and the farm workers in general. By building that ditch, we killed two birds with one stone. By not using the water from Las Margaritas, Mr. Bonifasi could make use of it. By installing a new turbine and generator on his own farm Mr. Bonifasi greatly improved his electrical service as well.

##### Lincoln College

The Tiquisate Agricultural Company subsidized a branch of American English College of Guatemala City in the city of Mazatenango that was called Lincoln College. The object of the company was to help educate the children of the company’s employees, charging their employees only ten Quetzals per month for each student that studied at the school. As I mentioned earlier, El Zambo grew bananas for this company. For this reason, I enjoyed the benefit of my children studying in that educational center on the same terms as the company’s employees. So it was that, in 1952, I enrolled Daniel and Rosa María in Lincoln College. We took advantage of the fact that the owners of neighboring farms, Mr. Agapito Álvarez Varona and Mr. Enrique Hoffens, had their children studying in that school. Mr. Álvarez took the children to school in his car at 7:30AM in the morning and Mr. Hoffens brought them home at 3:00PM in the afternoon. I made an agreement with both men and we decided that my children would travel to the farm of Mr. Álvarez every school day morning and Mr. Hoffens would pick them up from the college and drop them off at El Zambo. In this way, transportation was arranged for the students. Of course, I paid a small monthly fee. 

After that the only thing remaining was how to get them to the farm of Mister Álvarez in the morning. It just so happened that in those days someone offered to sell me a young mare with riding gear. I bought it for Daniel and gave it the name Tortolita. All I had to do was ask the horse wrangler Patrocinio and he agreed to give a ride to Rosa María on a horse belonging to the farm and to return with Tortolita to El Zambo.

To increase my income, and with the authorization of the farm’s owners, I build a chicken house in the rear of and a certain distance from the residence. The chicken yard was circled around with a wire fence and I covered the henhouse with a roof and sides of old sheet metal to keep the birds from inclement weather and from predatory animals. At this same time, I installed roosts, feeders and water holders. I soon purchased 300 chicks and a manual on raising and making income from chickens. I put the chickens temporarily into cages made by the carpenter Abel López Matheo on his own time. I vaccinated and mixed antibiotics with the water and applied all of the modern techniques of the time, resulting in a complete success. After six months, they began producing eggs of the first class that were sold primarily in Mazatenango.

#### 1953

The harvest at El Zambo was the largest it had ever been, surpassing 13,000 sacks of mature coffee. When I took charge of the farm in 1945, the farm was producing 5,000 sacks per year. This was an increase of more than 100%.

On October 21, I received a telegram from my sister Marta telling me that Mother was gravely ill and that my presence in Antigua was required. I showed the telegram to Mr. Santiago López, the farm’s owner, and asked permission to go. He gave me permission and, that same evening, I went to Mazatenango to catch the night train. I arrived in Guatemala City at 7:00AM in the morning and immediately boarded a bus, arriving in Antigua on the bus at 9:30AM in the morning. I found Mother in a coma but as soon as I came near her bed, she immediately opened her eyes and recognized me. She spoke to me and told me how glad she was that I was there. The rest of that day and night passed calmly. The next day in the afternoon she was in agonizing pain and died on the night of October 24, the day of Saint Rafael Archangel, to whom she was very devoted. The burial took place on the afternoon of October 25 and on the 26th I returned to the farm. I attest to the curious fact that for more than four years Mother was paralyzed by severe arthritis so that both legs were pulled up against her chest and were completely rigid. This kept her from standing, much less walking. But, from the moment she began to feel agonizing pain, slowly she began to stretch out her legs until they arrived at their normal position at the moment of her death.

The usual tranquility of the farm was disappearing. At the same time, all over the country fear and paranoia increased. Alarming news told of the quantity of political prisoners, shadowy tortures, disappearances and deaths of persons of every social class who were not in agreement with the procommunist ideology of President Arbenz Guzmán. El Zambo was the principal focus of the rebellion in our region. The rebellion was headed by Miguel López who was always trying to sabotage the work, inciting disobedience and looking for ways to keep whose who were not in agreement with his ideas from working. In that time, the worse sin was to be anti-communist. The Guatemalan press was censured. It was impossible for one to know the reality in which one lived. On one side, the official radio broadcast the government’s claim that it was the victim of the North Americans who, for their part, were defending the large investments US companies had in the country. On the other side was the clandestine radio, apparently operated by university students, whose announcers were Leonel Sisniega Otero, José Toron Barrios and Mario López Villatoro (but which turned out to be misinformation created by the CIA). Every night the clandestine radio station broadcast alarming news denouncing the government of its supposed assaults on the citizenry and announcing the imminent invasion of the country by rebel troops commanded by Colonel Carlos Castillo Armas from bases established by the CIA in Honduras.

#### 1954

The story of the administration of Arbenz is long and complicated. My objective in these recollections is only to give future generations some idea of the things that happened, things I witnessed or was told by those who took part in them and who could be believed. Historians have the task of understanding and impartially judging everything that happened and what caused them to happen.

In that sense, I can say that the situation at the farm was more dangerous every day. No one knew in whom to confide. Although all the permanent employees were anti-communist, the owners were fearful and stayed in Guatemala City. They came to the farm for very quick visits on only a few occasions. At night, we often turned out the lights and my wife Elisa and I turned on the radio and tuned to the clandestine radio at low volume to learn about political events that, due to the censure of the press, never surfaced with clarity. (We were unaware that the radio station was part of a CIA campaign of misinformation that was designed to spread panic in the country.) 

##### He was taken to be judged in my place

According to the clandestine radio, town mayors all over the country received orders from higher authorities to jail all persons of anti-communist ideology. I far as I was concerned, one time the farmer worker’s leader, Miguel López, informed the foreman of El Zambo, Mr. Maximilian X. (Mister Chilano), that he had orders to take me to the jail at San Francisco Zapotitlán, because I was anti-communist. Mr. Chilano, in order to protect me, responded, “If they jail Mr. Morales the farm would have no administrator. Think about it. There would be no one to pay us our salaries. It would be better to take some one else in his place.” Finally, they agreed to take the inoffensive driver Federico Taracena, a man of middle age and of few resources. He was taken to be judged in my place. He was taken prisoner for a space of four or five days but luck came to his aid. The Mayor of San Francisco, Mr. Osmundo Barrios, did not obey the orders he received by telegram to kill all of the political prisoners. Supposedly, higher authorities in Guatemala City sent those orders. 

Fortunately, those desperate days came to an end with the overthrow of the Arbenz government and the triumph of Castillo Armas. The rebels had the support of the majority of the people of Guatemala. In our locality, everyone was happy, the prisoners were freed and the worker’s leaders and agitators were, in their turn, caught and jailed. Among them was Miguel López. He spent a day tied to a pillar in front of the Municipal Market, on the side of the park, and afterward was jailed for some time.

Some of my friends in Antigua were jailed in early June just prior to the invasion led by Castillo Armas. They included, along with other persons whom I don’t remember, my friend Felipe Efraín Diaz, nicknamed “Masquilon”. He was an office worker and an honorable man of good habits who I mentioned in these recollections as a hero in the rescue work occasioned by the flood of October 9, 1935. Other friends of mine were arrested. They included Tomás Ortíz, nicknamed “Mashico”, a fine printer, without vices and dedicated to his work and Juan Hurtarte, nicknamed “Cucumaco”, an apolitical barber whose only crime was that because he was a barber he was kept well informed of all the things that were happening by his customers (which is generally the case with persons in his trade). Among the prisoners were the carpenter Samuel López, a young man of 23 to 25 years of age, and a retired Colonel with the name of Portillo, both of whom I knew without being friends of either. According to newspaper reports, these persons were brutally tortured. One night, they were taken to the cemetery with their arms bound to prevent their escape. There they were shot and immediately buried in a common grave. A few days after the fall of the Arbenz government on June 27, the bodies were exhumed and the national press published macabre photographs with detailed reports of the tortures they were subjected to before being shot. These men were killed because they were innocent and could not confess to the crimes of which they were accused. This happened to hundreds more all across the nation who had the same bad luck.

#### 1955

On February 16, my birthday, at about 5 o’clock in the evening, a group of 6 or 8 agitated workers from the farm, arrived at my house and informed me that the coffee plantation Robusta outside of San Francisco was burning. I hurried to the nearby house of our driver Santiago Murakawa so he could open the garage and bring the truck out. Accompanied by all the workers we could gather, we quickly gathered rubber boots, buckets, shovels and hoes and headed for the scene of the disaster, more or less a kilometer away. 

Upon arriving, we found that an enormous hollow ceiba trunk, which had fallen on the edges of the coffee plantation, was burning on the inside, producing an enormous cloud of smoke and throwing sparks in abundance. It was the driest time of the year and we ran the risk that the wind could pick up the sparks and start a fire in the coffee plantings. Fortunately, we found a river nearby where we obtained water. I put the people to doing the following tasks: most of the people carried water from the river, others removed brush from around the trunk and others moved dirt to cover the glowing embers.

When it was almost dark, Mr. Santiago López unexpectedly arrived in a new automobile that was not suitable for driving on the roads of the coffee plantation. He immediately left the car and, in an overbearing tone, said to me, “Why did you not advise me immediately of what was happening before coming to this place?” I answered, “I didn’t tell you because the door of your house was closed and the fire needed immediate attention. Since the farm was my responsibility, I wasted no time preventing a greater disaster”. He replied, “Now I am telling you that your obligation was to tell me before doing anything.” I said, “I repeat to you that my responsibility obligated me to lend help immediately to get the situation under control.” He replied, “I am tired of telling you that your obligation is to advise me before doing anything”. I replied, “I’m tired of you fucking with me!” He quickly withdrew and approached a group of workers that were the furthest away. He told them they could return to their homes. He got in his car and left, taking with him three or four men who were helping out. The rest of the people, including the driver Murakawa, continued to work without resting until finally, close to 11 o’clock at night, the fire was completely extinguished. We all went home in the truck. Upon arriving at the limits of the farm, I saw Mr. López standing on the porch of his house. I went up to him and said, “We left the fire completely extinguished.” He responded, “That’s good,” and then turned and went inside. Four or five days passed and Mr. López showed no signs of life. He did not come to the office as was his custom and he did not seek me out to exchange ideas about the work on the farm.

By chance, a few days before the fire, I was offered the job of Administrator of the nearby farm Venecia. I had not given the offer any thought but, in light of the incident I just described, I decided to meet with the owner of the farm. One afternoon, after finishing the day’s work, I saddled my horse and went to the farm mentioned. The interview with the owner was long and cordial. We finally reached an agreement that I would quickly resign my post at El Zambo and, in one month, assume the position at Venecia. This is the way things went. The following day, I had an interview with Mr. López and explained that I had decided to resign from the farm because it seemed that my presence was not necessary. He told me that he regretted what happened between us and asked me to not resign. He told me that if the reason for leaving was due to financial concerns, he was disposed to increase my salary. I then told him that money was not the motive for my resignation and that my decision had been made. Finally, I agreed to work for one month more and then I would leave.

A few days later, some friends advised that I would not like working at the Venecia Farm because the son of the owner, who ran everything concerning the administration, was very hardheaded and authoritarian. I spoke to other persons who all had the same opinion. For that reason, I told the owner that for personal reasons I could not take charge of his farm and thanking him for the confidence that he had shown in me.

##### Pio Pio

I rented a large two-story house in San Francisco Zapotitlán that belonged to my friend Enrique Hoffens. Almost as if it was sent from Heaven, I soon received a message from Mr. Francis Suriman of Swiss origin. He was the owner of a farm in Coatepeque and was someone with whom I was not acquainted. He offered to sell me equipment necessary for growing chickens. I met him and we talked for a long time. He told me that he had a chicken business but it took too much time away from his farm. For that reason, he had decided to close the business and sell the equipment. The equipment consisted of one incubator for 100 chicks, one brooder and automatic water dispenser, six horizontal feeders, six feeders with a vertical bell-shaped tank and an indeterminate number of adhesive stickers with a trademark in two colors with the name “Pio Pio”. He would also give me technical advice relative to the growing and selling of chickens as well as a list of his clients who purchased frozen chickens from him on a weekly basis. All of the above, he offered at a good price. We ended up by closing the deal. 

Now that I was moved into my new residence in San Francisco Zapotitlán, I moved the chickens and hens that I had at El Zambo there and placed orders to New Orleans for chicks to fatten. After a while, I had 4,000 animals of different sizes. My wife Elisa and I began to build the business, beginning with the tasks of killing, plucking, cleaning and weighing the chickens. We placed each one inside of a plastic bag with its corresponding sticker and placed them in the freezer. First, I visited the clients that had been recommended to me by Mr. Suriman. I took a sample with me and offered the product at 80 cents a pound delivered to the customer’s premises. Almost everyone accepted the offer and we scheduled weekly deliveries to Mrs. Luz de Mahler’s store in Mazatenango, Casa Antillon in San Antonio Suchitepéquez, the Blue Bird restaurant in Quetzaltenango and a restaurant in Tiquisate whose name I don’t remember.

One day, Mr. Antonio Bonifasi came to visit me. Mr. Bonifasi was a friend and the owner of the Las Margaritas farm that adjoined El Zambo. During the conversation, he asked me if I was interested in managing a coffee farm located in Tumbador in the Department of San Marcos. A short time before the owner had died and the widow needed a trustworthy and intelligent person who could take charge of the farm. Because she was a friend of Mr. Bonifasi, she placed him in charge of finding the right person for the job. He offered a salary of 500 Quetzals a month. I could see that the offer was very attractive but the difficulty was that I had five children of school age. At the time, the children were commuting daily by bus to La Illustration College, a private school in Mazatenango. I would have to live isolated from my family because there was no suitable school near the farm for my children and the area was completely unknown to me. For that reason, I thanked Mr. Bonifasi and asked for his understanding about why I could not accept the offer.

##### Las Elviras

Several weeks later, I received a visit from Doctor Flavio Andrade and his wife Mrs. María Dìaz Durán who offered me the management of their recently purchased farm “Las Elviras”. Las Elviras Farm is located north of San Francisco Zapotitlán along the highway to Quetzaltenango and at a somewhat higher elevation than San Francisco. I told them that I had recently begun the chicken business and this prevented me from working at other jobs. She replied that this was not an insurmountable obstacle because the farm had a large chicken yard that was surrounded with wire fencing and was practically empty. I could continue with the business with the help of my wife and another person. They also authorized the installation of a retail store so I could increase my income. This would also benefit the workers on the farm because they would not have to make the trip to the nearby town to buy food and supplies for their homes. We agreed that the next day they would come for me so I could see the farm and decide if I would accept the offer. Mr. and Mrs. Andrade arrived the next day as promised and took me and my wife to see the houses, facilities and the other installations, including the coffee plantation. The families seemed compatible and, since we liked the farm, we agreed that I would begin in two weeks. First I went alone and then, at the end of the school year in October, my family moved to the farm. This is how it was done and how I began my work at Las Elviras Farm. 

The doctor and his family lived in the Capital, Guatemala City. They knew nothing about agriculture and, for this reason they left me to do the work according to my criteria. Every two weeks they came, stayed three or four days on the farm and made their inspection of the coffee plantings on foot. Their conversations were very lively. The farm had a Jeep to which was hitched a little wagon that the overseer Bernabé Hernández Puac used to carry materials. In spite of having lived on farms for so many years, I had never bothered to learn how to drive a vehicle. One day, Mrs. Andrade said to me, “In order for you to move around free and not stay shut up on the farm all the time, you should learn how to drive the Jeep so you can use it as your own.” She appointed Bernabé to teach me how to drive. 

I didn’t wait for her to repeat the proposal. The next day, I told Bernabé what the boss lady wanted and that same afternoon, after finishing the day’s work, we went to the soccer field for my first lesson. We decided that the soccer field was the most appropriate place for this purpose. The training took three days and, on the fourth day, we hitched up the little wagon and I went by myself to San Francisco. I made the journey at a snail’s pace. I kept the Jeep in four-wheel drive and first gear. Only on the straight, flat parts of the road did I put it in second gear. 

Upon leaving the narrow and sloping roads of the farm, I entered the ancient highway that connects the cities of Mazatenango and Quetzaltenango. But, while going through a tight curve, the first mishap occurred. The little wagon overturned and remained upside down. Fortunately, it was empty and I was the only one on the highway. I quickly stopped, left the car and righted the wagon. I continued on until I arrived at our house in San Francisco. Elisa was greatly surprised to see that I had become an accomplished driver overnight. After a little rest and conversation, I put some of our things in the wagon and returned to the farm safe and sound. The weeks passed and, when the children finished school for the year, we handed over the house in San Francisco and the entire family settled in at the farm.

#### 1956

At the beginning of the school year in January, a teacher arrived at the Las Elviras Farm to give classes to the worker’s children. He was in charge of the primary school. Because the farm was quite removed from the highway, it was difficult for the children to use the buses that traveled to Mazatenango to attend the school they had attended the previous year. I asked the teacher to take charge of the instruction of our five children. I offered to pay a monthly fee that was separate from the salary that he received from the farm. He accepted the proposal and, during the entire school year, gave his official classes in the morning and private classes for our children in the afternoon. 

At this time, our son Daniel was 11 years old. He had a great attraction to cars from when he was very young. He always liked to sit next to the driver when we traveled. Sometimes he asked permission to steer and, since he made a favorable impression on everyone, he was often allowed to drive. So it was that when they gave me the Jeep for my use, it fell to him like a ring to a finger and quicker than you can count from two to three he was driving it better than I. Whenever there was a mechanical failure, he located the problem quickly and did whatever it took to repair it.

In accord with the agreement with Mr. And Mrs. Andrade, we proceeded to put in a variety store with merchandise that we purchased wholesale in Mazatenango. The store was a success because we sold at good prices and on credit. All of the articles that were purchased during a two-week period were paid for when the workers received their salary. Some customers from small neighboring farms came to us to make purchases. 

For several years, our good friend Mr. Carlos W. Lehnhoff managed the farm Los Nubes, a property of the Boppel family located in the neighborhood of El Zambo. Both families frequently got together. He was married to Bertha Grotewold and had six children. We had five children. The ages of the children coincided and, for this reason, everyone got along well. More or less two years before we left El Zambo, Mr. Lehnhoff resigned his job at Los Nubes and bought a small farm in the neighborhood of Mazatenango. He dedicated himself completely to cultivating his farm. Because of the proximity of our homes, we continued our visits and continued the intimate friendship that united us. A short time after we moved to Las Elviras, Mr. Lehnhoff told us that Mr. Juan C. Luttman, the owner of several farms and coffee facilities in the southeast of Mexico, contracted him to occupy the post of general manager and business agent for Lottman’s properties. Mr. Lehnhoff sold his little farm in Mazatenango and moved with all of his family to the farm Las Maravillas in the municipality of Tapachula in the state of Chiapas, Mexico. For a long time, we heard nothing of him.

On the 2nd of February, a solemn Mass was celebrated in the small church building at Las Elviras Farm. Immediately after the Mass children of the workers and our children Elisa Angelina, Rodolfo and Haydée were confirmed in order to receive First Communion. A very happy and well-attended party followed. Aerodynamic balloons made from crepe paper were floated aloft and an ensemble of marimba, drums and flute enlivened the activities. All of the workers received sports shirts and a meal of tamales, bread and chocolate was served. To end the party, a pretty show was presented by a group of workers from the farm. The show consisted of the traditional Dance of the Mexicans that the workers had been practicing for months. The costumes and masks were rented from an establishment in Quetzaltenango.

#### 1957

Mr. and Mrs. Andrade were magnificent people and good Christians. They treated their employees well and took care of the poor. However, they knew absolutely nothing about coffee cultivation. I imagine that they purchased the farm as a pastime and a place to spend their weekends. They probably also thought that it was a good business now that the price of coffee was very high. But they needed to make significant investments to the farm in the short term because most of the coffee trees were very old and would have to be replanted within the next four years in order to increase production. The harvest would decline during this time due to the cutting down of the old coffee trees to make room for newer varieties. The end result was that at the end of the agricultural year the profits were insignificant.

In the face of this realization, they began to see if they could find some person interested in buying the farm. Before long Mr. Manuel Ralda Ochoa arrived to inspect the farm and inquire about the current production, the condition of the coffee facility and the buildings in general. After a few weeks, Mr. and Mrs. Andrade informed me that they had concluded a deal with Mr. Ralda and that they would be handing the farm over to him soon. At the same time, Mr. Ralda sat down with me to tell me that he had purchased the farm. He asked me if I wanted to stay on to manager it. It was his intention to accelerate the work of replanting in as short a time as possible and he would like my collaboration in that work. A few days later the Andrade family handed the farm over to him and moved all of their things to Guatemala City where they lived. Mr. Ralda sent two of his trucks to move the furniture and equipment from the owner’s house. He commissioned me to take everything to the Andrade family residence in Guatemala City. I boarded one of the trucks, took my son Daniel with me for company and…we completed the mission.

Mr. Manuel Ralda was a wealthy person, educated and modest. He owned 26 farms of diverse types, mostly large cattle farms. He had 40,000 head of cattle. He was the president of a company that exported of farm and ranch products. It was called Exportadora Guatemalteca de Productos Agricolas y Ganaderos, S. A. (ExGuaPAGSA). His residence was in El Asintal in Retalhuleu Department. This house was huge. In an annex of the building was a grocery store, a meat market where he sold beef, pork, beef and pork sausage, fried pork skin, etc., and also a bar stocked with beer and liquors. His wife supervised these businesses and his brothers helped with the farms. 

On the Las Elviras Farm all the work of cultivating and replanting the coffee trees intensified. On one of his visits Mr. Ralda noticed that we were buying the articles in our store from Mazatenango. On the spur of the moment, he offered to sell us raw sugar (an article in great demand) that he made on one of his farms. He sent the product to us in one of his trucks. The quality was magnificent and the price very low. He did not even charge for the freight. This action helped us greatly and increased our profits from the store.

This year we enrolled our five children in La Ilustration College in Mazatenango where they roomed under the care of the principal and owner Professor Aurelia García de García. The children came to the farm on the weekends.

On July 27, Colonel Carlos Castillo Armas was assassinated inside the Presidential residence as he walked to the dining room to eat supper. General Guillermo Flores Avendano occupied the Presidency of the Republic in the interim.

#### 1958

On March 2, General Miguel Idígoras Fuentes took possession of the Presidency with my boss, Mr. Manuel Ralda Ochoa, as Vice-President.

In June, I received a letter from Carlos W. Lehnhoff offering me the management of a farm situated in Mexican territory. He painted a wonderful panorama for me: a salary of $3,500 MN which was equivalent to Q.250.00 a month; a month of vacation each year; a commission at the end of the harvest; a hundredweight of coffee of the best quality per year for my household and a vehicle for my use. He also made us aware that there were good schools for the children in Tapachula. As soon as I received the letter, I showed it to my wife Elisa and asked her opinion about the matter. Without thinking twice, she joyfully answered, “Let’s go!” When we calmed down, we discussed thoroughly the contents of the letter. We agreed to answer that, ‘Yes, the offer interested us’ and that we were disposed to test our luck in other areas outside of our homeland. Having done this, the next day I wrote Mr. Lehnhoff, letting him know that, “Yes, we would indeed appreciate a change of scenery” and that we were waiting for confirmation of the offer and the date of the interview with Mr. Luttman.

When Mr. Ralda came to the farm, I told him the news and showed him the letter. He made it plain that my leaving saddened him because he was satisfied with the work I had done on his property but because of the small size of the farm it was impossible for him to match the offer they had made to me. On the other hand, he was happy for me because opportunities like this one did not come easily. He did not doubt that the change would be beneficial for all the family. He was grateful for being informed of the situation at the first opportunity because this way he had sufficient time to look for a person who was capable and completely reliable to take my place in case our leaving was confirmed.

At the beginning of July, another letter from Mr. Lehnhoff arrived. The letter confirmed the interview with Mr. Luttman in his office at Number 5, 2nd Avenue North in Tapachula. I would have to begin the journey the morning of the day before and then wait at the Talisman border crossing for C. Antonio Lopezlena, the office manager. Early in the morning of the appointed day, following the instructions to the letter and with my nerves on edge, I left the farm near Mazatenango to board a bus going to the Talisman border crossing. This was the first time I had traveled to another country. When I arrived at the border at El Carmen, some people directed me to go to the office of immigration and ask for a local pass for Tapachula. Now, with the pass in hand, I was directed to the Mexican customs offices where I found Mr. Lopezlena at the entrance. He had the job of passing me through customs. He carried me in his car to Hotel Fenix in Tapachula where they put me up at the expense of the company. 

##### Interview with Mr. Luttman

Later in the day, my friend Carlos Lehnhoff came to visit me at the hotel. He was the administrator of the agricultural enterprise owned by Mr. Luttman. We talked for a long time. He told me that Federico Besche, the manager of the El Portillo farm, was about to retire. Before advertising for a replacement, he thought about me because, due to having known me for years, he knew my capabilities and that my way of treating people was to his liking. He was also confident in my ability to handle money. He had communicated all of the above to Mr. Luttman who indicated that he would like to meet me and form his own impression before he made up his mind to hire me. Mr. Luttman set a date for the meeting in Tapachula. At the end of our conversation, Mr. Lehnhoff and I parted with the understanding that the next day at 9 o’clock in the morning someone would pick me up at the hotel for the anxiously awaited interview.

At the prearranged time the young man, Antonio Lopezlena, arrived at the hotel to accompany me to the office of Mr. Luttman. We went on foot because it was only a short distance from the hotel to the office. Mr. Lehnhoff was already there. After a quick greeting, we walked to the office of Mr. Luttman. Mr. Lehnhoff introduced us and then withdrew leaving us alone. Mr. Luttman began the interrogation. “How old are you?” “How many years have you been managing coffee farms?” “At what elevations, high or low?” In this way, we talked for 3 ½ hours about all of my activities, the number of children, the children’s ages, etc. To wrap it up, we reached an agreement. The position that he was offering me was that of General Manager of the Agricultural Company ‘El Portillo’ in the municipality of Tuzantan in the state of Chiapas, Mexico, with the salary and benefits stipulated in the letter that had been sent to me in July by of the General Administrator Mr. Carlos Lenhoff. In addition to the cost of transportation, passports and immigration fees, including those of my wife and children, the company would bear the cost of obtaining permits in Mexico City and the cost of the Government permits to work as migrants for the first four years and, after that, as immigrants. The date of September 22 was set for me to present myself at El Portillo Farm and to begin the job. 

Before finishing the interview, Mr. Luttman called to Mr. Lehnhoff to fill him in on the agreement and, in this way, put an end to the interview. Upon leaving, Mr. Lehnhoff invited me to lunch in the Pan-American Hotel, the best in Tapachula in those days. We talked for a long time and commented on the positive outcome of the interview with Mr. Luttman. I said in passing that Mr. Luttman impressed me as a magnificent person, very intelligent and very agreeable in conversation with ample understanding of the cultivation, milling and commercialization of coffee. After lunch, Mr. Lehnhoff dropped me off at the Hotel Fenix where I spent the night. The following day, very early in the morning, they carried me to Talisman for my return journey to my native land where my family was expectantly awaiting the results of my journey.

##### Plans were made to leave

Elisa and I spent the afternoon of my return and part of the night talking about the outcome of my journey and beginning to make plans for the future. The task before us was not easy. We had two months to decide what we would take and what to sell, give away or leave. In a similar manner, we had to liquidate the contents of the store, the chickens, the hens, etc. The first thing I did was to tell Mr. Ralda that we would be leaving so he could find a substitute. The second thing was to ask about the papers we needed for our legal exit from Guatemala. At the same time, we had to continue our own work at the farm.

When our children were born, we took the precaution to get a good number of copies of the Birth Certificates from the Civil Registry. On this occasion, we used them to get passports and took the others for enrolling the children in the schools in Tapachula and for other things later on. Elisa and I were both born in Antigua Guatemala. It did not take a lot of time to get our birth certificates and take them to the Governor of the Department of Sacatepéquez so the authenticity of the signature of the Civil Register of Antigua Guatemala could be verified. Following that, we took the certificates to the Minister of the Departmental Government to authenticate the signature of the Governor. Finally, we took them to the Minister of Foreign Relations to authenticate the signature of the Minister of the Departmental Government. Following that, we got passports in the offices of Immigration of Guatemala and then went to the Mexican Consulate for the correct visa.

We advised all of our chicken and egg clients that when current stock was gone, we would stop supplying the products. We thanked them for the time during which they had favored us with their purchases. We sold all of the laying hens quickly. We packed all of the utensils and equipment that we were taking to Mexico in carefully numbered cardboard or wooden boxes with a list of contents in each box. The complete list in triplicate was presented to the Mexican Consul in Guatemala for his signature and his stamp with the intention of presenting the list to customs at Talisman when we crossed the border. Curiously, when I gave the list to the Consul he said, “Why are you going to Chiapas? It is the poorest state in Mexico. You would be better off going to Guadalajara or Monterrey.” I responded, “I am a coffee grower by profession. Chiapas is where coffee is grown on a large scale and I was contracted to work in that field.” He said, “Very well, I wish you a good trip and much success.”

In San Francisco Zapotitlán, we were friends with Julio Morales Ricci and his wife. Their house faced the park. They had a store that she ran and a materials hauling truck that he drove. One evening, we visited them and told them that we were moving to Mexico. He encouraged us and was certain that we would be successful. He was familiar with the climate having lived for three years in Mexican territory. We asked him if he could carry our things to the border and he said it would not be a problem. We agreed on a price for the trip but left the date hanging. My wife and I were going to go to take possession of the job in the middle of September. Moving the five children would have to wait until the permit from the Government arrived from Mexico and the school year ended. During the conversation, the business of the chickens came up and he said that he was interested in the small chickens that were not old enough to slaughter. We sold them the chickens. Also, they purchased the cages and the feeding troughs. Although they were not interested in the incubator and brooder, we included them in the deal in case they wanted to use them in the future.

In the meantime, Mr. Manuel Ralda let me know that he already had my substitute, a brother of his. He introduced us and, after that day, the brother came three or four times a week to familiarize himself with the work of the season and to meet the personnel and the field workers. Finally, on September 10, I handed the farm over to him and said goodbye to all my friends in the area. We left our stuff in one of the houses on the farm. The children continued to live at the school in Mazatenango. Elisa and I went to Antigua to get the passports, visas and other things. On September 22, we said goodbye to our relatives and went to Mexican territory to take possession of the work at the El Portillo Farm where we stayed until October 18. We then went back to Guatemala for a final goodbye, collected our goods that been left at Las Elviras and the five offspring who had finished the school year in Mazatenango. 

##### Offer the boss a shrimp

We returned to Mexico on October 27 with the family in a Jeep belonging to Julio Morales Ricci and the 24 boxes with our household furniture and supplies in the truck. We were not held up on the Guatemalan side of the border but, on the Mexican side, the head of immigration at Talisman, Héctor Lázaro Martínez, very serious, gruff and saying nothing, took the papers that the Mexican Consul in Guatemala had given us and began to read and reread them. Finally, indicating with his finger one item, he handed the papers back to me, saying, “The Consul forgot to note (I don’t remember what). Go back to Malacatán and tell the Mexican Consul to add what is missing.” 

I left the office to tell Julio to take me in the Jeep to Malacatán but two immigration employees, Joaquin Suárez and Tito Rodríguez, followed me out. They pulled me aside saying, “Look, Mister! To avoid the trip to Malacatan, offer the boss a ‘shrimp’ and he will see that everything is arranged.” (‘Shrimp’ is Mexican slang for a bribe.) I responded, “It is not really all that inconvenient for me to go to Malacatán.” They insisted, “You decide but be aware that time is passing and it is already afternoon. Follow our advice and you will see how quickly everything will be solved.” 

The true was I had no idea how much should be offered. I remember only that in Guatemala, when the old money was in circulation, before the Quetzal was introduced, they called the 100 Peso bill ‘shrimp’ because it was red. So I took a Mexican bill of 100 Pesos, entered the office and said in a low voice to the frowning ‘boss’, “Sir, because I am here in the company of my wife and five children, I am asking that if it is possible fix right here the problem with the papers prepared by the Consul.” I discreetly placed the banknote on the desk. He quickly opened the drawer and put the ‘shrimp’ inside. The change that came over the ‘boss’ was incredible. All smiles now, he said, “I am going to make an exception because your children must be tired. We are going to fix your papers here.” Haydée, who was nine years old, had, since we arrived in the office, remained standing in front of her mother, ignored by the ‘boss’. But now with the ‘shrimp’ inside the desk, he approached and, in a very pleasant manner, said to my wife, “Misses, the child must be tired. Sit her on the sofa. If you want something to eat next door is a hotel where they can serve you and, in the meantime, please move along to Customs.” As the expression goes, “Fucked over and thankful for it.” We thanked him for being so friendly and took our leave.

##### Good man, you are finished

From Herod to Pilate! Upon leaving immigration, we saw Antonio Lopezlena who had come to find us. A truck from the Las Maravillas Farm driven by the driver Lucas Vielman accompanied him. He was to transport our household goods to the El Portillo Farm. First, we had to go through Customs for the inspection. I gave the Inspector the inventory of the contents of the 24 boxes. He took the list and went over to the truck to take a look. He went into the office of the manager and soon the two men came out. When the manager saw the two trucks, one full and the other empty and ready to receive the boxes, he said, “You are bringing a lot of things. It is going to take us three days to examine them because we have a lot of work to do.” He then returned to his office. Lopezlena quickly came near me and said, “Undoubtedly, what they want is a bribe. Offer them a ‘shrimp’ to see what happens.” Based upon my experience at Immigration, I quickly took another 100 Peso banknote from my wallet, put it inside of the papers and entered the office of the manager saying, “Sir, I ask you to do me the favor of ordering a quick inspection of my things because I have to arrive at my destination today.” At the same time, I handed him the papers again. He took them and seeing the tail of the ‘shrimp’ that had appeared in the papers, placed them on the desk without reading them. In a practiced manner, he took the banknote out, slipped it into the drawer and said to me, “Follow me, please. I want to see again what you have. How many boxes are there?” I replied, “Twenty-four. They all come numbered and each one has the list of its contents.” “Very good, have the helpers from the trucks bring box number one.” The helpers from the truck belonging to Julio lowered the box and placed it on the floor. “Correct,” said the Customs man. I moved closer thinking that he wanted to open it but it wasn’t done like that. He gave the box a superficial glance and continued, “This one passes.” Turning to the helpers, he ordered them, “Now the next one! Hurry up because it is late.” The helpers from the truck from Las Maravillas began to lift the boxes into their truck. Moving the boxes from one truck to the other was done in a flash without opening even one to see what it contained. The manager said to me, “Good man, you are finished. You can go. Have a good trip.”

We said goodbye to Julio and were taken to Tapachula in Lopezlena’s car. Carlos Lehnhoff was waiting for us in the office. He took us in his pick-up truck to the Las Maravillas Farm. Las Maravillas was the administrative center and largest of Mr. Luttman’s farms. The IMSS hospital was there along with a battalion of Mexican army troops and a municipal judge. It was a good-sized company town and had direct bus service to Tapachula. We spent the night there and the next day he drove us to El Portillo.
